Florida, session 2026, HB5003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
438
439 Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that the
440 implementing and administering provisions of this act apply to
441 the General Appropriations Act for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
442 Section 2. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
443 5, 6, 88, and 89 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
444 the calculations of the Florida Education Finance Program for
445 the 2026-2027 fiscal year included in the document titled
446 "Public School Funding: The Florida Education Finance Program
447 (FEFP) Fiscal Year 2026-2027," dated February 12, 2026, and
448 filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives, are
449 incorporated by reference for the purpose of displaying the
450 calculations used by the Legislature, consistent with the
Page 18 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
451 requirements of state law, in making appropriations for the
452 Florida Education Finance Program. This section expires July 1,
453 2027.
454 Section 3. In order to implement Specific Appropriation 80
455 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the school
456 readiness reimbursement rates for the 2026-2027 fiscal year
457 included in the document titled "School Readiness Program
458 Reimbursement Rates Fiscal Year 2026-2027," dated February 12,
459 2026, and filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives,
460 are incorporated by reference, consistent with the requirements
461 of state law, in making appropriations for the school readiness
462 program allocation. This section expires July 1, 2027.
463 Section 4. In order to implement Specific Appropriations 5
464 and 88 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, paragraph
465 (a) of subsection (4) and subsections (12) and (19) of section
466 1011.62, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
467 1011.62 Funds for operation of schools.—If the annual
468 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each
469 district for operation of schools is not determined in the
470 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing
471 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as
472 follows:
473 (4) COMPUTATION OF DISTRICT REQUIRED LOCAL EFFORT.—The
474 Legislature shall prescribe the aggregate required local effort
475 for all school districts collectively as an item in the General
Page 19 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
476 Appropriations Act for each fiscal year. The amount that each
477 district shall provide annually toward the cost of the Florida
478 Education Finance Program for kindergarten through grade 12
479 programs shall be calculated as follows:
480 (a) Estimated taxable value calculations.—
481 1.a. Not later than 2 working days before July 19, the
482 Department of Revenue shall certify to the Commissioner of
483 Education its most recent estimate of the taxable value for
484 school purposes in each school district and the total for all
485 school districts in the state for the current calendar year
486 based on the latest available data obtained from the local
487 property appraisers. The value certified shall be the taxable
488 value for school purposes for that year, and no further
489 adjustments shall be made, except those made pursuant to
490 paragraphs (c) and (d), or an assessment roll change required by
491 final judicial decisions as specified in paragraph (15)(b). Not
492 later than July 19, the Commissioner of Education shall compute
493 a millage rate, rounded to the next highest one one-thousandth
494 of a mill, which, when applied to 96 percent of the estimated
495 state total taxable value for school purposes, would generate
496 the prescribed aggregate required local effort for that year for
497 all districts. The Commissioner of Education shall certify to
498 each district school board the millage rate, computed as
499 prescribed in this subparagraph, as the minimum millage rate
500 necessary to provide the district required local effort for that
Page 20 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
501 year.
502 b. The General Appropriations Act shall direct the
503 computation of the statewide adjusted aggregate amount for
504 required local effort for all school districts collectively from
505 ad valorem taxes to ensure that no school district's revenue
506 from required local effort millage will produce more than 85 90
507 percent of the district's total Florida Education Finance
508 Program calculation as calculated and adopted by the
509 Legislature, and the adjustment of the required local effort
510 millage rate of each district that produces more than 85 90
511 percent of its total Florida Education Finance Program
512 entitlement to a level that will produce only 85 90 percent of
513 its total Florida Education Finance Program entitlement in the
514 July calculation.
515 2. On the same date as the certification in sub-
516 subparagraph 1.a., the Department of Revenue shall certify to
517 the Commissioner of Education for each district:
518 a. Each year for which the property appraiser has
519 certified the taxable value pursuant to s. 193.122(2) or (3), if
520 applicable, since the prior certification under sub-subparagraph
521 1.a.
522 b. For each year identified in sub-subparagraph a., the
523 taxable value certified by the appraiser pursuant to s.
524 193.122(2) or (3), if applicable, since the prior certification
525 under sub-subparagraph 1.a. This is the certification that
Page 21 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
526 reflects all final administrative actions of the value
527 adjustment board.
528 (12) SAFE SCHOOLS ALLOCATION.—A safe schools allocation is
529 created to provide funding to assist school districts in their
530 compliance with ss. 1006.07-1006.12, with priority given to
531 safe-school officers pursuant to s. 1006.12.
532 (a) The safe schools allocation shall be calculated as
533 follows:
534 1. For each school facility required to have a safe-school
535 officer as prescribed by the Office of Safe Schools, the number
536 of safe-school officers shall be determined based on the
537 recommended ratio of unweighted full-time equivalent students
538 per safe-school officer as specified in the General
539 Appropriations Act.
540 2. Any school facility with a prior year percentage of law
541 enforcement-reported incidents which is higher than the
542 percentage reported in the School Environmental Safety Incident
543 Reporting System pursuant to s. 1006.07(9), per unweighted full-
544 time equivalent student as specified in the General
545 Appropriations Act, shall receive one additional safe-school
546 officer.
547 3. The sum of safe-school officers determined under
548 subparagraphs 1. and 2. shall be multiplied by the school
549 district's safe schools factor as specified in the General
550 Appropriations Act. The product shall be the school district's
Page 22 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
551 amount of the safe schools allocation each school district shall
552 receive a minimum safe schools allocation in an amount provided
553 in the General Appropriations Act. Of the remaining balance of
554 the safe schools allocation, one-third shall be allocated to
555 school districts based on the most recent official Florida Crime
556 Index provided by the Department of Law Enforcement and two-
557 thirds shall be allocated based on each school district's
558 proportionate share of the state's total unweighted full-time
559 equivalent student enrollment.
560 (b) If a district school board is required by s. 1006.12 to
561 assign a school resource officer or school safety officer to a
562 charter school, the charter school's share of costs for such
563 officer may not exceed the amount of funds allocated to the
564 charter school under this subsection.
565 (c) The safe schools allocation shall be recalculated
566 during the fiscal year based on actual full-time equivalent
567 student membership.
568 (19) FAMILY EMPOWERMENT SCHOLARSHIP EDUCATIONAL ENROLLMENT
569 STABILIZATION PROGRAM.—
570 (a) The family empowerment scholarship educational
571 enrollment stabilization program is created to provide
572 supplemental state funds as needed if the number of weighted
573 full-time equivalent Family Empowerment Scholarship students in
574 a school district is greater than the number of such students
575 provided in the General Appropriations Act and the school
Page 23 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
576 district's amount of funds per weighted full-time equivalent
577 student is less than the amount of such funds provided in the
578 General Appropriations Act to maintain the stability of the
579 operations of public schools in each school district and to
580 protect districts, including charter schools, from financial
581 instability as a result of changes in full-time equivalent
582 student enrollment throughout the school year.
583 (b) The Legislature may shall annually appropriate funds
584 in the General Appropriations Act to the Department of Education
585 for this program in an amount necessary to fully fund the number
586 of eligible Family Empowerment Scholarship students.
587 (c) The stabilization fund amount for each school district
588 shall be calculated as follows:
589 1. Subtract from the current number of weighted full-time
590 equivalent Family Empowerment Scholarship students the
591 appropriated number of weighted full-time equivalent Family
592 Empowerment Scholarship students.
593 2. Subtract from the appropriated amount of funds per
594 weighted full-time equivalent student the current amount of
595 funds per weighted full-time equivalent student.
596 3. If both amounts calculated in subparagraphs 1. and 2.
597 are greater than zero, multiply the difference calculated in
598 subparagraph 1. by the appropriated amount of funds per weighted
599 full-time equivalent student and multiply the difference
600 calculated in subparagraph 2. by the current number of weighted
Page 24 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
601 full-time equivalent students.
602 4. The lesser of the two amounts calculated in
603 subparagraph 3. equals the amount of the school district's
604 stabilization fund.
605 5. If the total of school district stabilization funds for
606 all districts is greater than the amounts appropriated for the
607 program, each school district's allocation shall be prorated
608 based on its proportionate share of the calculated amount.
609 (d) The funding for the family empowerment scholarship
610 stabilization program shall be recalculated during the fiscal
611 year based on actual full-time equivalent student membership
612 maintain a projected minimum balance of $250 million at the
613 beginning of the upcoming fiscal year. The Department of
614 Education shall use funds as appropriated to ensure that based
615 on each recalculation of the Florida Education Finance Program
616 pursuant to paragraph (1)(a), a school district's funds per
617 unweighted full-time equivalent student are not less than the
618 greater of either the school district's funds per unweighted
619 full-time equivalent student as appropriated in the General
620 Appropriations Act or the school district's funds per unweighted
621 full-time equivalent student as recalculated based upon the
622 receipt of the certified taxable value for school purposes
623 pursuant to s. 1011.62(4).
624 (c) Notwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351,
625 the unexpended balance of funds appropriated pursuant to this
Page 25 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
626 subsection which is not disbursed by June 30 of the fiscal year
627 in which the funds are appropriated may be carried forward for
628 up to 10 years after the effective date of the original
629 appropriation.
630 Section 5. The amendments to s. 1011.62(4)(a), (12), and
631 (19), Florida Statutes, made by this act expire July 1, 2027,
632 and the text of that paragraph and subsections, as applicable,
633 shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2026, except that
634 any amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall
635 be preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such
636 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which
637 expire pursuant to this section.
638 Section 6. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
639 152 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
640 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 5 of chapter
641 2025-199, Laws of Florida, subsections (3) and (5) of section
642 1011.45, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read:
643 1011.45 End of year balance of funds.—Unexpended amounts
644 in any fund in a university current year operating budget shall
645 be carried forward and included as the balance forward for that
646 fund in the approved operating budget for the following year.
647 (3) A university's carry forward spending plan must
648 include the estimated cost per planned expenditure and a
649 timeline for completion of the expenditure. A carry forward
650 spending plan may include retention of the carry forward balance
Page 26 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
651 as a reserve fund to be used for authorized expenses in
652 subsequent years. For any annual reserve balance in excess of
653 the 7 percent minimum carry forward balance pursuant to
654 subsection (1), the authorized expenditures in a carry forward
655 spending plan must include a commitment of 12 percent of the
656 university's 2026-2027 fiscal year state operating fund carry
657 forward balance to fund a public education capital outlay
658 project for which an appropriation has previously been provided
659 which requires additional funds for completion and which is
660 included in the list required by s. 1001.706(12)(d) or for
661 deferred building maintenance expenses. The carry forward
662 spending plan must identify the specific public education
663 capital outlay project and the amount the university will
664 contribute toward the fixed capital outlay project pursuant to
665 s. 1001.706(12)(d) or specific deferred maintenance project.
666 Authorized expenditures in a carry forward spending plan may
667 include:
668 (a) Commitment of funds to a public education capital
669 outlay project for which an appropriation has previously been
670 provided that requires additional funds for completion and which
671 is included in the list required by s. 1001.706(12)(d);
672 (b) Completion of a renovation, repair, or maintenance
673 project that is consistent with s. 1013.64(1) or replacement of
674 a minor facility;
675 (c) Completion of a remodeling or infrastructure project,
Page 27 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
676 including a project for a developmental research school, if such
677 project is survey recommended pursuant to s. 1013.31;
678 (d) Completion of a repair or replacement project
679 necessary due to damage caused by a natural disaster for
680 buildings included in the inventory required pursuant to s.
681 1013.31;
682 (e) Operating expenditures that support the university's
683 mission;
684 (f) Any purpose specified by the board or in the General
685 Appropriations Act, including the requirements in s.
686 1001.706(12)(c) or similar requirements pursuant to Board of
687 Governors regulations;
688 (g) A commitment of funds to a contingency reserve for
689 expenses incurred as a result of a state of emergency declared
690 by the Governor pursuant to s. 252.36; and
691 (h) Deferred building maintenance expenses for the
692 maintenance, repair, and renovation of projects to improve the
693 health and safety of such facilities.
694 (5) A university's carry forward spending plan pursuant to
695 subsection (1) must provide detailed documentation of
696 expenditures that the university applied toward the prior year
697 carry forward spending plan.
698 Section 7. The text of s. 1011.45(3) and (5), Florida
699 Statutes, as carried forward from chapter 2025-199, Laws of
700 Florida, by this act, expires July 1, 2027, and the text of
Page 28 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
701 those subsections shall revert to that in existence on June 30,
702 2025, except that any amendments to such text enacted other than
703 by this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the
704 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions
705 of text which expire pursuant to this section.
706 Section 8. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
707 152 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
708 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 7 of chapter
709 2025-199, Laws of Florida, subsection (18) of section 1009.26,
710 Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
711 1009.26 Fee waivers.—
712 (18)(a) For every course in a Program of Strategic
713 Emphasis, or in a state-approved teacher preparation program
714 identified by the Board of Governors, as identified in
715 subparagraph 3., in which a student is enrolled and has out-of-
716 pocket expenses for tuition and fees after all other federal,
717 state, and institutional gift aid is applied, a state university
718 shall waive 100 percent of the tuition and fees of the student's
719 out-of-pocket expenses for an equivalent course in such program
720 for a student who:
721 1. Is a resident for tuition purposes under s. 1009.21.
722 2. Has earned at least 60 semester credit hours towards a
723 baccalaureate degree within 2 academic years after initial
724 enrollment at a Florida public postsecondary institution.
725 3. Enrolls in one of 10 Programs of Strategic Emphasis as
Page 29 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
726 adopted by the Board of Governors or a state-approved teacher
727 preparation program. The Board of Governors shall adopt eight
728 Programs of Strategic Emphasis in science, technology,
729 engineering, or math; beginning with the 2022-2023 academic
730 year, two Programs of Strategic Emphasis in the critical
731 workforce gap analysis category; and beginning with the 2023-
732 2024 academic year, two state-approved teacher preparation
733 programs for which a student may be eligible to receive the
734 tuition and fee waiver authorized by this subsection. The
735 programs identified by the board must reflect the priorities of
736 the state and be offered at a majority of state universities at
737 the time the Board of Governors approves the list.
738 (b) A waiver granted under this subsection is applicable
739 only for upper-level courses and up to 110 percent of the number
740 of required credit hours of the baccalaureate degree program for
741 which the student is enrolled. A student granted a waiver under
742 this subsection shall continue receiving the waiver until the
743 student graduates, exceeds the number of allowable credit hours,
744 or withdraws from an eligible program, regardless of whether the
745 program is removed from the approved list of eligible programs
746 subsequent to the student's enrollment.
747 (c) Each state university shall report to the Board of
748 Governors the number and value of all waivers granted annually
749 under this subsection. A state university in compliance with
750 this subsection may earn incentive funding, subject to
Page 30 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
751 appropriation, in addition to the funding provided under s.
752 1001.92.
753 (d) The Board of Governors shall adopt regulations to
754 administer this subsection.
755 Section 9. The text of s. 1009.26(18), Florida Statutes,
756 as carried forward from chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, by
757 this act, expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that subsection
758 shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2025, except that
759 any amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall
760 be preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such
761 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which
762 expire pursuant to this section.
763 Section 10. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
764 129 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
765 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 9 of chapter
766 2025-199, Laws of Florida, section 1004.89, Florida Statutes, is
767 reenacted to read:
768 1004.89 Institute for Freedom in the Americas.— The
769 Institute for Freedom in the Americas is hereby created at Miami
770 Dade College to preserve the ideals of a free society and
771 promote democracy in the Americas. The institute shall be
772 located at the Freedom Tower and shall:
773 (1) Hold workshops, symposiums, and conferences that
774 provide networking opportunities for leaders throughout the
775 region to gain new insights and ideas for promoting democracy,
Page 31 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
776 including knowledge of and insight into the intellectual,
777 political, and economic freedoms that are foundational to a
778 democratic society.
779 (2) Enter into an agreement with the Adam Smith Center for
780 Economic Freedom to provide participants with academic
781 coursework and programs that advance democratic practices and
782 economic and legal reforms.
783 (3) Provide educational and experiential opportunities for
784 regional leaders committed to careers in democracy and
785 governance.
786 Section 11. The text of s. 1004.89, Florida Statutes, as
787 carried forward from chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, by this
788 act, expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that section shall
789 revert to that in existence on June 30, 2025, except that any
790 amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall be
791 preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such
792 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which
793 expire pursuant to this section.
794 Section 12. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
795 17 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, a state
796 university board of trustees that is beginning an approved
797 capital outlay project with a health care provider may accept
798 the health care provider's procurement methods and construction
799 contracts entered thereunder and may reimburse the health care
800 provider for its expenses using the proceeds from a bond
Page 32 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
801 issuance approved by the Board of Governors. This section
802 expires July 1, 2027.
803 Section 13. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
804 209 through 237 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
805 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
806 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget
807 amendment, subject to the notice, review, and objection
808 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to realign funding
809 within the Medicaid program appropriation categories to address
810 projected surpluses and deficits within the program and to
811 maximize the use of state trust funds. A single budget amendment
812 shall be submitted in the last quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal
813 year only. This section expires July 1, 2027.
814 Section 14. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
815 190 through 195 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
816 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
817 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget
818 amendment, subject to the notice, review, and objection
819 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to realign funding
820 within the Florida Kidcare program appropriation categories to
821 address projected surpluses and deficits within the program or
822 to maximize the use of state trust funds. A single budget
823 amendment must be submitted by each agency in the last quarter
824 of the 2026-2027 fiscal year only. This section expires July 1,
825 2027.
Page 33 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
826 Section 15. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
827 216, 217, 219, and 223 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations
828 Act, the Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a
829 budget amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes,
830 requesting additional spending authority to implement the
831 federally approved Directed Payment Program for hospitals
832 statewide providing inpatient and outpatient services to
833 Medicaid managed care enrollees, the Indirect Medical Education
834 (IME) Program, and a nursing workforce expansion and education
835 program for certain institutions participating in a graduate
836 medical education or nursing education program. The budget
837 amendment must include written notice of approval from the
838 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approving the state-
839 directed payment. For institutions participating in the nursing
840 workforce expansion and education program, the budget amendment
841 must identify the educational institutions partnering with the
842 teaching hospital. Institutions participating in the nursing
843 workforce expansion and education program shall provide
844 quarterly reports to the agency detailing the number of nurses
845 participating in the program. This section expires July 1, 2027.
846 Section 16. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
847 217, 219, and 223 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
848 the Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget
849 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting
850 additional spending authority to implement the federally
Page 34 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
851 approved Directed Payment Program and fee-for-service
852 supplemental payments for cancer hospitals that meet the
853 criteria in 42 U.S.C. s. 1395ww(d)(1)(B)(v). The budget
854 amendment must include written notice of approval from the
855 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approving the state-
856 directed payment. This section expires July 1, 2027.
857 Section 17. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
858 209 through 237 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the
859 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget
860 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting
861 additional spending authority to implement the Low Income Pool
862 component of the Florida Managed Medical Assistance
863 Demonstration up to the total computable funds authorized by the
864 federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The budget
865 amendment must include an approved Reimbursement and Funding
866 Methodology, the final terms and conditions of the Low Income
867 Pool, a proposed distribution model by entity, and a listing of
868 entities contributing intergovernmental transfers to support the
869 state match required. In addition, for each entity included in
870 the distribution model, a signed attestation must be provided
871 that includes the charity care cost upon which the Low Income
872 Pool payment is based and an acknowledgment that should the
873 distribution result in an overpayment based on the Low Income
874 Pool cost limit audit, the entity is responsible for returning
875 that overpayment to the agency for return to the federal Centers
Page 35 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
876 for Medicare and Medicaid Services. This section expires July 1,
877 2027.
878 Section 18. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
879 222 and 223 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the
880 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget
881 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting
882 additional spending authority to implement fee-for-service
883 supplemental payments and a directed payment program for
884 physicians and subordinate licensed health care practitioners
885 employed by or under contract with a Florida medical or dental
886 school, or a public hospital. The budget amendment must include
887 written notice of approval from the Centers for Medicare and
888 Medicaid Services approving the state-directed payment. This
889 section expires July 1, 2027.
890 Section 19. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
891 220, 223, and 235 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
892 the Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget
893 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting
894 additional spending authority to implement a certified
895 expenditure program for emergency medical transportation
896 services. The budget amendment must include written notice of
897 approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
898 approving the state-directed payment. This section expires July
899 1, 2027.
900 Section 20. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
Page 36 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
901 209 through 237 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
902 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
903 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget
904 amendment subject to the notice, review, and objection
905 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, requesting
906 additional spending authority to implement the Disproportionate
907 Share Hospital Program. The budget amendment must include
908 written notice of approval from the Centers for Medicare and
909 Medicaid Services approving the state-directed payment, a
910 proposed distribution model by entity and a listing of entities
911 contributing intergovernmental transfers and certified public
912 expenditures to support the state match required. This section
913 expires July 1, 2027.
914 Section 21. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
915 217 through 219 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the
916 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget
917 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting
918 additional spending authority to implement fee-for-service
919 inpatient and outpatient supplemental payments for specialty
920 hospitals as defined in s. 395.002(28), Florida Statutes,
921 providing comprehensive acute care services to children with
922 Medicaid inpatient utilization equal to or greater than 50
923 percent and located in a county with greater than 250,000
924 Medicaid enrollees in 2023. The budget amendment must include
925 written notice of approval from the Centers for Medicare and
Page 37 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
926 Medicaid Services approving the state-directed payment. This
927 section expires July 1, 2027.
928 Section 22. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
929 201 and 228 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
930 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
931 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit budget
932 amendments, subject to the notice, review, and objection
933 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget
934 authority to support the Florida School-Based Services program.
935 This section expires July 1, 2027.
936 Section 23. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
937 339B of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
938 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
939 Department of Children and Families may submit a budget
940 amendment, subject to the notice, review, and objection
941 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to realign funding
942 within the department based on the implementation of the
943 Guardianship Assistance Program, between the specific
944 appropriations for guardianship assistance payments, foster care
945 Level 1 room and board payments, relative caregiver payments,
946 and nonrelative caregiver payments. This section expires July 1,
947 2027.
948 Section 24. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
949 209 through 211, 217, 219, 220, 222 through 224, 363, 372, 475,
950 479, 480, 486, 501, 502, 508, and 512 of the 2026-2027 General
Page 38 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
951 Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292,
952 Florida Statutes, the Department of Children and Families, the
953 Department of Health, and the Agency for Health Care
954 Administration may submit budget amendments, subject to the
955 notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida
956 Statutes, to increase budget authority to support refugee
957 programs administered by the federal Office of Refugee
958 Resettlement. The Department of Children and Families shall
959 submit quarterly reports to the Executive Office of the
960 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
961 House of Representatives on the number of refugees entering the
962 state, the nations of origin of such refugees, and current
963 expenditure projections. This section expires July 1, 2027.
964 Section 25. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
965 216 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsections (3)
966 and (6) of section 409.909, Florida Statutes, are amended to
967 read:
968 409.909 Statewide Medicaid Residency Program.—
969 (3) The agency shall use the following formula to
970 calculate an allocation fraction for a participating hospitals,
971 hospital's and participating qualifying institutions, the Slots
972 for Doctors Program, and the Behavioral Health Teaching Hospital
973 Slots for Doctors Program institution's allocation fraction:
974 HAF = [0.9 x (HFTE/TFTE)] + [0.1 x (HMP/TMP)]
975 Where:
Page 39 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
976 HAF = A hospital's and qualifying institution's allocation
977 fraction.
978 HFTE = A hospital's and qualifying institution's total
979 number of FTE residents.
980 TFTE = The total FTE residents for all participating
981 hospitals and qualifying institutions.
982 HMP = A hospital's and qualifying institution's Medicaid
983 payments.
984 TMP = The total Medicaid payments for all participating
985 hospitals and qualifying institutions.
986 (6) The Slots for Doctors Program is established to
987 address the physician workforce shortage by increasing the
988 supply of highly trained physicians through the creation of new
989 resident positions, which will increase access to care and
990 improve health outcomes for Medicaid recipients. The agency
991 shall use the formula under subsection (3) to calculate annual
992 allocations to hospitals, qualifying institutions, and
993 behavioral health teaching hospitals.
994 (a)1. Notwithstanding subsection (4), the agency shall
995 annually allocate $100,000 to hospitals, qualifying
996 institutions, and behavioral health teaching hospitals
997 designated under s. 395.902 for each newly created resident
998 position that is first filled on or after June 1, 2023, and
999 filled thereafter, and that is accredited by the Accreditation
1000 Council for Graduate Medical Education or the Osteopathic
Page 40 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1001 Postdoctoral Training Institution in an initial or established
1002 accredited training program which is in a physician specialty or
1003 subspecialty in a statewide supply-and-demand deficit.
1004 2. Notwithstanding the requirement that a new resident
1005 position be created to receive funding under this subsection,
1006 the agency may allocate $100,000 to hospitals and qualifying
1007 institutions, pursuant to subparagraph 1., for up to 100
1008 resident positions that existed before July 1, 2023, if such
1009 resident position:
1010 a. Is in a physician specialty or subspecialty
1011 experiencing a statewide supply-and-demand deficit;
1012 b. Has been unfilled for a period of 3 or more years;
1013 c. Is subsequently filled on or after June 1, 2024, and
1014 remains filled thereafter; and
1015 d. Is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate
1016 Medical Education or the Osteopathic Postdoctoral Training
1017 Institution in an initial or established accredited training
1018 program.
1019 3. If applications for resident positions under this
1020 paragraph exceed the number of authorized resident positions or
1021 the available funding allocated, the agency shall prioritize
1022 applications for resident positions that are in a primary care
1023 specialty as specified in paragraph (2)(a).
1024 (b) This program is designed to generate matching funds
1025 under Medicaid and distribute such funds to participating
Page 41 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1026 hospitals, qualifying institutions, and behavioral health
1027 teaching hospitals designated under s. 395.902, on a quarterly
1028 basis in each fiscal year for which an appropriation is made.
1029 Resident positions created under this subsection are not
1030 eligible for concurrent funding pursuant to subsection (1).
1031 (c) For purposes of this subsection, physician specialties
1032 and subspecialties, both adult and pediatric, in statewide
1033 supply-and-demand deficit are those identified as such in the
1034 General Appropriations Act.
1035 (d) Funds allocated pursuant to this subsection may not be
1036 used for resident positions that have previously received
1037 funding pursuant to subsection (1).
1038 Section 26. The amendments to s. 409.909(3) and (6),
1039 Florida Statutes, made by this act expire July 1, 2027, and the
1040 text of those subsections shall revert to that in existence on
1041 June 30, 2026, except that any amendments to such text enacted
1042 other than by this act shall be preserved and continue to
1043 operate to the extent that such amendments are not dependent
1044 upon the portions of text which expire pursuant to this section.
1045 Section 27. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1046 295 through 390A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
1047 and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes,
1048 the Department of Children and Families may submit budget
1049 amendments, subject to the notice, review, and objection
1050 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget
Page 42 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1051 authority to support the following federal grant programs: the
1052 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Grant Program, the Pandemic
1053 Electronic Benefit Transfer, the American Rescue Plan Grant, the
1054 State Opioid Response Grant, the Substance Use Prevention and
1055 Treatment Block Grant, the Chafee Grant for Independent Living
1056 Services, Education and Traditional Voucher Grant, Title IV-B
1057 Subparts 1 and 2 Grants, Elder Justice Act, STOP Violence
1058 Against Women Grant, the Rapid Unsheltered Survivor Housing
1059 Grant, and the Mental Health Block Grant. This section expires
1060 July 1, 2027.
1061 Section 28. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1062 250, 254, and 267 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
1063 and notwithstanding the expiration date in section 32 of chapter
1064 2025-199, Laws of Florida, subsection (2) of section 393.066,
1065 Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1066 393.066 Community services and treatment.—
1067 (2) Necessary services shall be purchased, rather than
1068 provided directly by the agency, when the purchase of services
1069 is more cost-efficient than providing them directly. All
1070 purchased services must be approved by the agency. As a
1071 condition of payment and before billing, persons or entities
1072 under contract with the agency to provide services shall use
1073 agency data management systems to document service provision to
1074 clients or shall maintain such information in its own data
1075 management system and electronically transmit it to the agency
Page 43 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1076 data management system in an industry standard electronic format
1077 designated by the agency. The agency may not require training on
1078 the use of agency data management systems by persons or entities
1079 that choose to maintain data in their own data management
1080 system, provided that they electronically transmit required
1081 information in a format and frequency designated by the agency.
1082 Contracted persons and entities shall meet the minimum hardware
1083 and software technical requirements established by the agency
1084 for the use of such systems. Such persons or entities shall also
1085 meet any requirements established by the agency for training and
1086 professional development of staff providing direct services to
1087 clients.
1088 Section 29. The text of s. 393.066(2), Florida Statutes,
1089 as carried forward from chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, by
1090 this act, expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that subsection
1091 shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2025, except that
1092 any amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall
1093 be preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such
1094 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which
1095 expire pursuant to this section.
1096 Section 30. Effective upon this act becoming a law, and in
1097 order to implement Specific Appropriations 375 through 388 of
1098 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (c) of
1099 subsection (9) of section 394.9082, Florida Statutes, is amended
1100 to read:
Page 44 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1101 394.9082 Behavioral health managing entities.—
1102 (9) FUNDING FOR MANAGING ENTITIES.—
1103 (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), for the 2026-2027 2025-
1104 2026 fiscal year, a managing entity may carry forward documented
1105 unexpended funds appropriated for Non-Qualified Counties from
1106 the State Opioid Settlement Trust Fund from 1 fiscal year to the
1107 next. Funds carried forward pursuant to this paragraph are not
1108 included in the 8 percent cumulative cap that may be carried
1109 forward. This paragraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
1110 Section 31. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1111 465 through 467 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
1112 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
1113 Department of Health may submit a budget amendment, subject to
1114 the notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177,
1115 Florida Statutes, to increase budget authority for the
1116 Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children
1117 (WIC) and the Child Care Food Program if additional federal
1118 revenues will be expended in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. This
1119 section expires July 1, 2027.
1120 Section 32. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1121 476 through 526 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
1122 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
1123 Department of Health may submit a budget amendment, subject to
1124 the notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177,
1125 Florida Statutes, to increase budget authority for the HIV/AIDS
Page 45 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1126 Prevention and Treatment Program if additional federal revenues
1127 specific to HIV/AIDS prevention and treatment become available
1128 in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. This section expires July 1, 2027.
1129 Section 33. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
1130 203 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
1131 notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Agency for
1132 Health Care Administration shall immediately suspend all
1133 development activities related to the modular replacement of the
1134 Florida Medicaid Management Information System, referred to as
1135 the Florida Health Care Connections Project (FX), for any system
1136 components, modules, or functionality that have not yet achieved
1137 operational status and federal certification where applicable;
1138 provided, however, that system components that are currently
1139 certified and operational shall continue to be maintained and
1140 supported to ensure uninterrupted service delivery. This section
1141 expires July 1, 2027.
1142 Section 34. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
1143 230 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
1144 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
1145 Agency for Health Care Administration and the Agency for Persons
1146 with Disabilities may submit budget amendments, subject to the
1147 notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida
1148 Statutes, at least 3 days before the effective date of the
1149 action, to increase budget authority to support the
1150 implementation of the home and community-based services Medicaid
Page 46 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1151 waiver program of the Agency for Persons with Disabilities. This
1152 section expires July 1, 2027.
1153 Section 35. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
1154 594 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
1155 notwithstanding chapter 216, Florida Statutes, the Department of
1156 Veterans' Affairs may submit a budget amendment, subject to
1157 Legislative Budget Commission approval, requesting the authority
1158 to establish positions in excess of the number authorized by the
1159 Legislature, increase appropriations from the Operations and
1160 Maintenance Trust Fund, or provide a necessary salary rate
1161 sufficient to provide for essential staff for veterans' nursing
1162 homes, if the department projects that additional direct care
1163 staff are needed to meet its established staffing ratio. This
1164 section expires July 1, 2027.
1165 Section 36. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1166 209 through 237 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
1167 subsection (1) of section 409.915, Florida Statutes, is amended
1168 to read:
1169 409.915 County contributions to Medicaid.—Although the
1170 state is responsible for the full portion of the state share of
1171 the matching funds required for the Medicaid program, the state
1172 shall charge the counties an annual contribution in order to
1173 acquire a certain portion of these funds.
1174 (1)(a) As used in this section, the term "state Medicaid
1175 expenditures" means those expenditures used as matching funds
Page 47 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1176 for the federal Medicaid program.
1177 (b) The term does not include funds specially assessed by
1178 any local governmental entity and used as the nonfederal share
1179 for the hospital directed payment program after July 1, 2021.
1180 This paragraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
1181 Section 37. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1182 594 through 622A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
1183 the Department of Veterans' Affairs may submit budget amendments
1184 pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, subject to federal
1185 approval, requesting additional spending authority to support
1186 the development and construction of a new State Veterans'
1187 Nursing Home and Adult Day Health Care Center in Collier County.
1188 This section expires July 1, 2027.
1189 Section 38. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1190 404 and 416 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
1191 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
1192 Department of Elderly Affairs may submit a budget amendment,
1193 subject to the notice, review, and objection procedures of s.
1194 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget authority for the
1195 United States Department of Agriculture's Adult Care Food
1196 Program if additional federal revenues will be expended in the
1197 2026-2027 fiscal year. This section expires July 1, 2027.
1198 Section 39. In order to implement appropriations of the
1199 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (c) of
1200 subsection (9) of section 766.314, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 48 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1201 to read:
1202 766.314 Assessments; plan of operation.—
1203 (9)
1204 (c)1. If the total of all current estimates equals or
1205 exceeds 100 percent of the funds on hand and the funds that will
1206 become available to the association within the next 12 months
1207 from all sources described in subsection (4) and paragraph
1208 (5)(a), the association may not accept any new claims without
1209 express authority from the Legislature. This section does not
1210 preclude the association from accepting any claim if the injury
1211 occurred 18 months or more before the effective date of this
1212 suspension. Within 30 days after the effective date of this
1213 suspension, the association shall notify the Governor, the
1214 Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the
1215 Senate, the Office of Insurance Regulation, the Agency for
1216 Health Care Administration, and the Department of Health of this
1217 suspension.
1218 2. Notwithstanding this paragraph, the association is
1219 authorized to accept new claims during the 2026-2027 2025-2026
1220 fiscal year if the total of all current estimates exceeds the
1221 limits described in subparagraph 1. during that fiscal year.
1222 This subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
1223 Section 40. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
1224 339 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (5)
1225 of section 409.990, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 49 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1226 409.990 Funding for lead agencies.—A contract established
1227 between the department and a lead agency must be funded by a
1228 grant of general revenue, other applicable state funds, or
1229 applicable federal funding sources.
1230 (5) A lead agency may carry forward documented unexpended
1231 state funds from one fiscal year to the next; however, the
1232 cumulative amount carried forward may not exceed 8 percent of
1233 the annual amount of the total contract. Any unexpended state
1234 funds in excess of that percentage must be returned to the
1235 department.
1236 (a) The funds carried forward may not be used in any way
1237 that would create increased recurring future obligations, and
1238 such funds may not be used for any type of program or service
1239 that is not currently authorized by the existing contract with
1240 the department.
1241 (b) Expenditures of funds carried forward must be
1242 separately reported to the department.
1243 (c) Any unexpended funds that remain at the end of the
1244 contract period shall be returned to the department.
1245 (d) Funds carried forward may be retained through any
1246 contract renewals and any new procurements as long as the same
1247 lead agency is retained by the department.
1248 Section 41. The amendment to s. 409.990(5), Florida
1249 Statutes, made by this act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of
1250 that paragraph shall revert to that in existence on June 30,
Page 50 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1251 2026, except that any amendments to such text enacted other than
1252 by this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the
1253 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions
1254 of text which expire pursuant to this section.
1255 Section 42. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1256 626 through 718 and 742 through 782 of the 2026-2027 General
1257 Appropriations Act, subsection (4) of section 216.262, Florida
1258 Statutes, is amended to read:
1259 216.262 Authorized positions.—
1260 (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter
1261 relating to increasing the number of authorized positions, and
1262 for the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year only, if the actual
1263 inmate population of the Department of Corrections exceeds the
1264 inmate population projections of the December 23, 2025 February
1265 21, 2025, Criminal Justice Estimating Conference by 1 percent
1266 for 2 consecutive months or 2 percent for any month, the
1267 Executive Office of the Governor, with the approval of the
1268 Legislative Budget Commission, shall immediately notify the
1269 Criminal Justice Estimating Conference, which shall convene as
1270 soon as possible to revise the estimates. The Department of
1271 Corrections may then submit a budget amendment requesting the
1272 establishment of positions in excess of the number authorized by
1273 the Legislature and additional appropriations from unallocated
1274 general revenue sufficient to provide for essential staff, fixed
1275 capital improvements, and other resources to provide
Page 51 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1276 classification, security, food services, health services, and
1277 other variable expenses within the institutions to accommodate
1278 the estimated increase in the inmate population. All actions
1279 taken pursuant to this subsection are subject to review and
1280 approval by the Legislative Budget Commission. This subsection
1281 expires July 1, 2027 2026.
1282 Section 43. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1283 3340 through 3409 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
1284 subsection (2) of section 215.18, Florida Statutes, is amended
1285 to read:
1286 215.18 Transfers between funds; limitation.—
1287 (2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may receive one
1288 or more trust fund loans to ensure that the state court system
1289 has funds sufficient to meet its appropriations in the 2026-2027
1290 2025-2026 General Appropriations Act. If the Chief Justice
1291 accesses the loan, he or she must notify the Governor and the
1292 chairs of the legislative appropriations committees in writing.
1293 The loan must come from other funds in the State Treasury which
1294 are for the time being or otherwise in excess of the amounts
1295 necessary to meet the just requirements of such last-mentioned
1296 funds. The Governor shall order the transfer of funds within 5
1297 days after the written notification from the Chief Justice. If
1298 the Governor does not order the transfer, the Chief Financial
1299 Officer shall transfer the requested funds. The loan of funds
1300 from which any money is temporarily transferred must be repaid
Page 52 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1301 by the end of the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year. This
1302 subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026.
1303 Section 44. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1304 1183 through 1195 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act:
1305 (1) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall review county
1306 juvenile detention payments to ensure that counties fulfill
1307 their financial responsibilities required in s. 985.6865,
1308 Florida Statutes. If the Department of Juvenile Justice
1309 determines that a county has not met its obligations, the
1310 department shall direct the Department of Revenue to deduct the
1311 amount owed to the Department of Juvenile Justice from the funds
1312 provided to the county under s. 218.23, Florida Statutes. The
1313 Department of Revenue shall transfer the funds withheld to the
1314 Shared County/State Juvenile Detention Trust Fund.
1315 (2) As an assurance to holders of bonds issued by counties
1316 before July 1, 2026, for which distributions made pursuant to s.
1317 218.23, Florida Statutes, are pledged, or bonds issued to refund
1318 such bonds which mature no later than the bonds they refunded
1319 and which result in a reduction of debt service payable in each
1320 fiscal year, the amount available for distribution to a county
1321 shall remain as provided by law and continue to be subject to
1322 any lien or claim on behalf of the bondholders. The Department
1323 of Revenue must ensure, based on information provided by an
1324 affected county, that any reduction in amounts distributed
1325 pursuant to subsection (1) does not reduce the amount of
Page 53 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1326 distribution to a county below the amount necessary for the
1327 timely payment of principal and interest when due on the bonds
1328 and the amount necessary to comply with any covenant under the
1329 bond resolution or other documents relating to the issuance of
1330 the bonds. If a reduction to a county's monthly distribution
1331 must be decreased in order to comply with this section, the
1332 Department of Revenue must notify the Department of Juvenile
1333 Justice of the amount of the decrease, and the Department of
1334 Juvenile Justice must send a bill for payment of such amount to
1335 the affected county.
1336 (3) This section expires July 1, 2027.
1337 Section 45. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1338 793 through 817A, 978 through 1125, and 1146 through 1182 of the
1339 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding the
1340 expiration date in section 52 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of
1341 Florida, subsection (1), paragraph (a) of subsection (2),
1342 paragraph (a) of subsection (3), and subsections (5), (6), and
1343 (7) of section 27.40, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read:
1344 27.40 Court-appointed counsel; circuit registries; minimum
1345 requirements; appointment by court.—
1346 (1) Counsel shall be appointed to represent any individual
1347 in a criminal or civil proceeding entitled to court-appointed
1348 counsel under the Federal or State Constitution or as authorized
1349 by general law. The court shall appoint a public defender to
1350 represent indigent persons as authorized in s. 27.51. The office
Page 54 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1351 of criminal conflict and civil regional counsel shall be
1352 appointed to represent persons in those cases in which provision
1353 is made for court-appointed counsel, but only after the public
1354 defender has certified to the court in writing that the public
1355 defender is unable to provide representation due to a conflict
1356 of interest or is not authorized to provide representation. The
1357 public defender shall report, in the aggregate, the specific
1358 basis of all conflicts of interest certified to the court. On a
1359 quarterly basis, the public defender shall submit this
1360 information to the Justice Administrative Commission.
1361 (2)(a) Private counsel shall be appointed to represent
1362 persons in those cases in which provision is made for court-
1363 appointed counsel but only after the office of criminal conflict
1364 and civil regional counsel has been appointed and has certified
1365 to the court in writing that the criminal conflict and civil
1366 regional counsel is unable to provide representation due to a
1367 conflict of interest. The criminal conflict and civil regional
1368 counsel shall report, in the aggregate, the specific basis of
1369 all conflicts of interest certified to the court. On a quarterly
1370 basis, the criminal conflict and civil regional counsel shall
1371 submit this information to the Justice Administrative
1372 Commission.
1373 (3) In using a registry:
1374 (a) The chief judge of the circuit shall compile a list of
1375 attorneys in private practice, by county and by category of
Page 55 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1376 cases, and provide the list to the clerk of court in each
1377 county. The chief judge of the circuit may restrict the number
1378 of attorneys on the general registry list. To be included on a
1379 registry, an attorney must certify that he or she:
1380 1. Meets any minimum requirements established by the chief
1381 judge and by general law for court appointment;
1382 2. Is available to represent indigent defendants in cases
1383 requiring court appointment of private counsel; and
1384 3. Is willing to abide by the terms of the contract for
1385 services, s. 27.5304, and this section.
1386
1387 To be included on a registry, an attorney must enter into a
1388 contract for services with the Justice Administrative
1389 Commission. Failure to comply with the terms of the contract for
1390 services may result in termination of the contract and removal
1391 from the registry. Each attorney on the registry is responsible
1392 for notifying the clerk of the court and the Justice
1393 Administrative Commission of any change in his or her status.
1394 Failure to comply with this requirement is cause for termination
1395 of the contract for services and removal from the registry until
1396 the requirement is fulfilled.
1397 (5) The Justice Administrative Commission shall approve
1398 uniform contract forms for use in procuring the services of
1399 private court-appointed counsel and uniform procedures and forms
1400 for use by a court-appointed attorney in support of billing for
Page 56 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1401 attorney's fees, costs, and related expenses to demonstrate the
1402 attorney's completion of specified duties. Such uniform
1403 contracts and forms for use in billing must be consistent with
1404 s. 27.5304, s. 216.311, and the General Appropriations Act and
1405 must contain the following statement: "The State of Florida's
1406 performance and obligation to pay under this contract is
1407 contingent upon an annual appropriation by the Legislature."
1408 (6) After court appointment, the attorney must immediately
1409 file a notice of appearance with the court indicating acceptance
1410 of the appointment to represent the defendant and of the terms
1411 of the uniform contract as specified in subsection (5).
1412 (7)(a) A private attorney appointed by the court from the
1413 registry to represent a client is entitled to payment as
1414 provided in s. 27.5304 so long as the requirements of subsection
1415 (1) and paragraph (2)(a) are met. An attorney appointed by the
1416 court who is not on the registry list may be compensated under
1417 s. 27.5304 only if the court finds in the order of appointment
1418 that there were no registry attorneys available for
1419 representation for that case and only if the requirements of
1420 subsection (1) and paragraph (2)(a) are met.
1421 (b)1. The flat fee established in s. 27.5304 and the
1422 General Appropriations Act shall be presumed by the court to be
1423 sufficient compensation. The attorney shall maintain appropriate
1424 documentation, including contemporaneous and detailed hourly
1425 accounting of time spent representing the client. If the
Page 57 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1426 attorney fails to maintain such contemporaneous and detailed
1427 hourly records, the attorney waives the right to seek
1428 compensation in excess of the flat fee established in s. 27.5304
1429 and the General Appropriations Act. These records and documents
1430 are subject to review by the Justice Administrative Commission
1431 and audit by the Auditor General, subject to the attorney-client
1432 privilege and work-product privilege. The attorney shall
1433 maintain the records and documents in a manner that enables the
1434 attorney to redact any information subject to a privilege in
1435 order to facilitate the commission's review of the records and
1436 documents and not to impede such review. The attorney may redact
1437 information from the records and documents only to the extent
1438 necessary to comply with the privilege. The Justice
1439 Administrative Commission shall review such records and shall
1440 contemporaneously document such review before authorizing
1441 payment to an attorney. Objections by or on behalf of the
1442 Justice Administrative Commission to records or documents or to
1443 claims for payment by the attorney shall be presumed correct by
1444 the court unless the court determines, in writing, that
1445 competent and substantial evidence exists to justify overcoming
1446 the presumption.
1447 2. If an attorney fails, refuses, or declines to permit
1448 the commission or the Auditor General to review documentation
1449 for a case as provided in this paragraph, the attorney waives
1450 the right to seek, and the commission may not pay, compensation
Page 58 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1451 in excess of the flat fee established in s. 27.5304 and the
1452 General Appropriations Act for that case.
1453 3. A finding by the commission that an attorney has waived
1454 the right to seek compensation in excess of the flat fee
1455 established in s. 27.5304 and the General Appropriations Act, as
1456 provided in this paragraph, shall be presumed to be correct,
1457 unless the court determines, in writing, that competent and
1458 substantial evidence exists to justify overcoming the
1459 presumption.
1460 Section 46. The text of s. 27.40(1), (2)(a), (3)(a), (5),
1461 (6), and (7), Florida Statutes, as carried forward from chapter
1462 2019-116, Laws of Florida, by this act, expires July 1, 2027,
1463 and the text of those subsections and paragraphs, as applicable,
1464 shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2019, except that
1465 any amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall
1466 be preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such
1467 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which
1468 expire pursuant to this section.
1469 Section 47. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1470 793 through 817A, 978 through 1125, and 1146 through 1182 of the
1471 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding the
1472 expiration date in section 54 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of
1473 Florida, subsection (13) of section 27.5304, Florida Statutes,
1474 is amended, and subsections (1), (3), (6), (7), and (11), and
1475 paragraphs (a) through (e) of subsection (12) of that section
Page 59 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1476 are reenacted, to read:
1477 27.5304 Private court-appointed counsel; compensation;
1478 notice.—
1479 (1) Private court-appointed counsel appointed in the
1480 manner prescribed in s. 27.40(1) and (2)(a) shall be compensated
1481 by the Justice Administrative Commission only as provided in
1482 this section and the General Appropriations Act. The flat fees
1483 prescribed in this section are limitations on compensation. The
1484 specific flat fee amounts for compensation shall be established
1485 annually in the General Appropriations Act. The attorney also
1486 shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses in
1487 accordance with s. 29.007. If the attorney is representing a
1488 defendant charged with more than one offense in the same case,
1489 the attorney shall be compensated at the rate provided for the
1490 most serious offense for which he or she represented the
1491 defendant. This section does not allow stacking of the fee
1492 limits established by this section.
1493 (3) The court retains primary authority and responsibility
1494 for determining the reasonableness of all billings for attorney
1495 fees, costs, and related expenses, subject to statutory
1496 limitations and the requirements of s. 27.40(7). Private court-
1497 appointed counsel is entitled to compensation upon final
1498 disposition of a case.
1499 (6) For compensation for representation pursuant to a
1500 court appointment in a proceeding under chapter 39:
Page 60 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1501 (a) At the trial level, compensation for representation
1502 for dependency proceedings shall not exceed $1,450 for the first
1503 year following the date of appointment and shall not exceed $700
1504 each year thereafter. Compensation shall be paid based upon
1505 representation of a parent irrespective of the number of case
1506 numbers that may be assigned or the number of children involved,
1507 including any children born during the pendency of the
1508 proceeding. Any appeal, except for an appeal from an
1509 adjudication of dependency, shall be completed by the trial
1510 attorney and is considered compensated by the flat fee for
1511 dependency proceedings.
1512 1. Counsel may bill the flat fee not exceeding $1,450
1513 following disposition or upon dismissal of the petition.
1514 2. Counsel may bill the annual flat fee not exceeding $700
1515 following the first judicial review in the second year following
1516 the date of appointment and each year thereafter as long as the
1517 case remains under protective supervision.
1518 3. If the court grants a motion to reactivate protective
1519 supervision, the attorney shall receive the annual flat fee not
1520 exceeding $700 following the first judicial review and up to an
1521 additional $700 each year thereafter.
1522 4. If, during the course of dependency proceedings, a
1523 proceeding to terminate parental rights is initiated,
1524 compensation shall be as set forth in paragraph (b). If counsel
1525 handling the dependency proceeding is not authorized to handle
Page 61 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1526 proceedings to terminate parental rights, the counsel must
1527 withdraw and new counsel must be appointed.
1528 (b) At the trial level, compensation for representation in
1529 termination of parental rights proceedings shall not exceed
1530 $1,800 for the first year following the date of appointment and
1531 shall not exceed $700 each year thereafter. Compensation shall
1532 be paid based upon representation of a parent irrespective of
1533 the number of case numbers that may be assigned or the number of
1534 children involved, including any children born during the
1535 pendency of the proceeding. Any appeal, except for an appeal
1536 from an order granting or denying termination of parental
1537 rights, shall be completed by trial counsel and is considered
1538 compensated by the flat fee for termination of parental rights
1539 proceedings. If the individual has dependency proceedings
1540 ongoing as to other children, those proceedings are considered
1541 part of the termination of parental rights proceedings as long
1542 as that termination of parental rights proceeding is ongoing.
1543 1. Counsel may bill the flat fee not exceeding $1,800 30
1544 days after rendition of the final order. Each request for
1545 payment submitted to the Justice Administrative Commission must
1546 include the trial counsel's certification that:
1547 a. Counsel discussed grounds for appeal with the parent or
1548 that counsel attempted and was unable to contact the parent; and
1549 b. No appeal will be filed or that a notice of appeal and
1550 a motion for appointment of appellate counsel, containing the
Page 62 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1551 signature of the parent, have been filed.
1552 2. Counsel may bill the annual flat fee not exceeding $700
1553 following the first judicial review in the second year after the
1554 date of appointment and each year thereafter as long as the
1555 termination of parental rights proceedings are still ongoing.
1556 (c) For appeals from an adjudication of dependency,
1557 compensation may not exceed $1,800.
1558 1. Counsel may bill a flat fee not exceeding $1,200 upon
1559 filing the initial brief or the granting of a motion to
1560 withdraw.
1561 2. If a brief is filed, counsel may bill an additional
1562 flat fee not exceeding $600 upon rendition of the mandate.
1563 (d) For an appeal from an adjudication of termination of
1564 parental rights, compensation may not exceed $3,500.
1565 1. Counsel may bill a flat fee not exceeding $1,750 upon
1566 filing the initial brief or the granting of a motion to
1567 withdraw.
1568 2. If a brief is filed, counsel may bill an additional
1569 flat fee not exceeding $1,750 upon rendition of the mandate.
1570 (7) Counsel eligible to receive compensation from the
1571 state for representation pursuant to court appointment made in
1572 accordance with the requirements of s. 27.40(1) and (2)(a) in a
1573 proceeding under chapter 384, chapter 390, chapter 392, chapter
1574 393, chapter 394, chapter 397, chapter 415, chapter 743, chapter
1575 744, or chapter 984 shall receive compensation not to exceed the
Page 63 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1576 limits prescribed in the General Appropriations Act. Any such
1577 compensation must be determined as provided in s. 27.40(7).
1578 (11) It is the intent of the Legislature that the flat
1579 fees prescribed under this section and the General
1580 Appropriations Act comprise the full and complete compensation
1581 for private court-appointed counsel. It is further the intent of
1582 the Legislature that the fees in this section are prescribed for
1583 the purpose of providing counsel with notice of the limit on the
1584 amount of compensation for representation in particular
1585 proceedings and the sole procedure and requirements for
1586 obtaining payment for the same.
1587 (a) If court-appointed counsel moves to withdraw prior to
1588 the full performance of his or her duties through the completion
1589 of the case, the court shall presume that the attorney is not
1590 entitled to the payment of the full flat fee established under
1591 this section and the General Appropriations Act.
1592 (b) If court-appointed counsel is allowed to withdraw from
1593 representation prior to the full performance of his or her
1594 duties through the completion of the case and the court appoints
1595 a subsequent attorney, the total compensation for the initial
1596 and any and all subsequent attorneys may not exceed the flat fee
1597 established under this section and the General Appropriations
1598 Act, except as provided in subsection (12).
1599
1600 This subsection constitutes notice to any subsequently appointed
Page 64 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1601 attorney that he or she will not be compensated the full flat
1602 fee.
1603 (12) The Legislature recognizes that on rare occasions an
1604 attorney may receive a case that requires extraordinary and
1605 unusual effort.
1606 (a) If counsel seeks compensation that exceeds the limits
1607 prescribed by law, he or she must file a motion with the chief
1608 judge for an order approving payment of attorney fees in excess
1609 of these limits.
1610 1. Before filing the motion, the counsel shall deliver a
1611 copy of the intended billing, together with supporting
1612 affidavits and all other necessary documentation, to the Justice
1613 Administrative Commission.
1614 2. The Justice Administrative Commission shall review the
1615 billings, affidavit, and documentation for completeness and
1616 compliance with contractual and statutory requirements and shall
1617 contemporaneously document such review before authorizing
1618 payment to an attorney. If the Justice Administrative Commission
1619 objects to any portion of the proposed billing, the objection
1620 and supporting reasons must be communicated in writing to the
1621 private court-appointed counsel. The counsel may thereafter file
1622 his or her motion, which must specify whether the commission
1623 objects to any portion of the billing or the sufficiency of
1624 documentation, and shall attach the commission's letter stating
1625 its objection.
Page 65 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1626 (b) Following receipt of the motion to exceed the fee
1627 limits, the chief judge or a single designee shall hold an
1628 evidentiary hearing. The chief judge may select only one judge
1629 per circuit to hear and determine motions pursuant to this
1630 subsection, except multicounty circuits and the eleventh circuit
1631 may have up to two designees.
1632 1. At the hearing, the attorney seeking compensation must
1633 prove by competent and substantial evidence that the case
1634 required extraordinary and unusual efforts. The chief judge or
1635 single designee shall consider criteria such as the number of
1636 witnesses, the complexity of the factual and legal issues, and
1637 the length of trial. The fact that a trial was conducted in a
1638 case does not, by itself, constitute competent substantial
1639 evidence of an extraordinary and unusual effort. In a criminal
1640 case, relief under this section may not be granted if the number
1641 of work hours does not exceed 75 or the number of the state's
1642 witnesses deposed does not exceed 20.
1643 2. Objections by or on behalf of the Justice
1644 Administrative Commission to records or documents or to claims
1645 for payment by the attorney shall be presumed correct by the
1646 court unless the court determines, in writing, that competent
1647 and substantial evidence exists to justify overcoming the
1648 presumption. The chief judge or single designee shall enter a
1649 written order detailing his or her findings and identifying the
1650 extraordinary nature of the time and efforts of the attorney in
Page 66 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1651 the case which warrant exceeding the flat fee established by
1652 this section and the General Appropriations Act.
1653 (c) A copy of the motion and attachments shall be served
1654 on the Justice Administrative Commission at least 20 business
1655 days before the date of a hearing. The Justice Administrative
1656 Commission has standing to appear before the court, and may
1657 appear in person or telephonically, including at the hearing
1658 under paragraph (b), to contest any motion for an order
1659 approving payment of attorney fees, costs, or related expenses
1660 and may participate in a hearing on the motion by use of
1661 telephonic or other communication equipment. The Justice
1662 Administrative Commission may contract with other public or
1663 private entities or individuals to appear before the court for
1664 the purpose of contesting any motion for an order approving
1665 payment of attorney fees, costs, or related expenses. The fact
1666 that the Justice Administrative Commission has not objected to
1667 any portion of the billing or to the sufficiency of the
1668 documentation is not binding on the court.
1669 (d) If the chief judge or a single designee finds that
1670 counsel has proved by competent and substantial evidence that
1671 the case required extraordinary and unusual efforts, the chief
1672 judge or single designee shall order the compensation to be paid
1673 to the attorney at a percentage above the flat fee rate,
1674 depending on the extent of the unusual and extraordinary effort
1675 required. The percentage must be only the rate necessary to
Page 67 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1676 ensure that the fees paid are not confiscatory under common law.
1677 The percentage may not exceed 200 percent of the established
1678 flat fee, absent a specific finding that 200 percent of the flat
1679 fee in the case would be confiscatory. If the chief judge or
1680 single designee determines that 200 percent of the flat fee
1681 would be confiscatory, he or she shall order the amount of
1682 compensation using an hourly rate not to exceed $75 per hour for
1683 a noncapital case and $100 per hour for a capital case. However,
1684 the compensation calculated by using the hourly rate shall be
1685 only that amount necessary to ensure that the total fees paid
1686 are not confiscatory, subject to the requirements of s.
1687 27.40(7).
1688 (e) Any order granting relief under this subsection must
1689 be attached to the final request for a payment submitted to the
1690 Justice Administrative Commission and must satisfy the
1691 requirements of subparagraph (b)2.
1692 (13) Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in
1693 subsection (5) and for the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year only,
1694 the compensation for representation in a criminal proceeding may
1695 not exceed the following:
1696 (a) For misdemeanors and juveniles represented at the
1697 trial level: $2,000.
1698 (b) For noncapital, nonlife felonies represented at the
1699 trial level: $15,000.
1700 (c) For life felonies represented at the trial level:
Page 68 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1701 $15,000.
1702 (d) For capital cases represented at the trial level:
1703 $25,000. For purposes of this paragraph, a "capital case" is any
1704 offense for which the potential sentence is death and the state
1705 has not waived seeking the death penalty.
1706 (e) For representation on appeal: $9,000.
1707 (f) This subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026.
1708 Section 48. The text of s. 27.5304(1), (3), (7), (11), and
1709 (12)(a)-(e), Florida Statutes, as carried forward from chapter
1710 2019-116, Laws of Florida, and the text of s. 27.5304(6),
1711 Florida Statutes, as carried forward from chapter 2023-240, Laws
1712 of Florida, by this act, expires July 1, 2027, and the text of
1713 those subsections and paragraphs, as applicable, shall revert to
1714 that in existence on June 30, 2019, except that any amendments
1715 to such text enacted other than by this act shall be preserved
1716 and continue to operate to the extent that such amendments are
1717 not dependent upon the portions of text which expire pursuant to
1718 this section.
1719 Section 49. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1720 1348 through 1353 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
1721 subsection (3) of section 908.1033, Florida Statutes, is amended
1722 to read:
1723 908.1033 Local Law Enforcement Immigration Grant Program.—
1724 (3)(a) A local law enforcement agency may apply to the
1725 State Board of Immigration Enforcement to provide bonus payments
Page 69 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1726 for the agency's local law enforcement officers who participate
1727 in United States Department of Homeland Security at-large task
1728 force operations. The local law enforcement agency may apply for
1729 a bonus of up to $1,000 for each local law enforcement officer
1730 employed within that agency. The local law enforcement agency
1731 must certify to the board that the local law enforcement officer
1732 participated in one or more operations and provide any
1733 information required by the board. Eligible participation does
1734 not include operations occurring solely at state correctional
1735 facilities or county detention facilities.
1736 (b) The bonus payment shall be adjusted to include 7.65
1737 percent for the officers' share of Federal Insurance
1738 Contribution Act tax on the bonus.
1739 (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), and for the 2026-2027
1740 2025-2026 fiscal year, a local law enforcement agency may apply
1741 to the State Board of Immigration Enforcement to provide bonus
1742 payments for the agency's certified correctional officers under
1743 s. 943.10(2), who are a warrant service officer under s. 287(g)
1744 of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1357 or an
1745 immigration officer under the jail enforcement model under s.
1746 287(g) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1357.
1747 The local law enforcement agency may apply for a bonus of up to
1748 $1,000 for each certified correctional officer employed with
1749 that county detention facility. The local law enforcement agency
1750 must certify to the board that the certified correctional
Page 70 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1751 officer acted in such capacity as a warrant service officer or
1752 an immigration officer under the jail enforcement model for at
1753 least 6 months preceding the application and provide any
1754 information required by the board. Eligible participation does
1755 not include operations occurring solely at state correctional
1756 facilities. This paragraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
1757 Section 50. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
1758 1405 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
1759 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
1760 Department of Legal Affairs may submit a budget amendment,
1761 subject to the notice, review, and objection procedures of s.
1762 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget authority for
1763 Victims of Crime Act (VOCA) assistance grants if additional
1764 federal revenues specific to VOCA assistance services become
1765 available in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. This section expires
1766 July 1, 2027.
1767 Section 51. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1768 1325 through 1340 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
1769 the Department of Law Enforcement shall conduct a study on
1770 payment scams. For purposes of this section, "payment" means any
1771 mechanism through which an individual can electronically
1772 transfer funds to another individual. The study must:
1773 (a) Examine current trends and developments in payment
1774 scams, identify effective methods for preventing such scams, and
1775 issue recommendations to enhance efforts to identify and prevent
Page 71 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1776 such activities.
1777 (b) Adopt a cross-sector approach to ensure its
1778 recommendations reflect the full scope of the issue, given that
1779 scams impact individuals across a wide range of industries,
1780 including financial services, telecommunications, and
1781 technology.
1782 (c) Evaluate best practices for combating methods used by
1783 scammers, including spoofed calls, scam text messages, and
1784 malicious advertisements, pop-ups, and websites.
1785 (d) Assess how other state, federal, and international
1786 jurisdictions have tried to prevent payment scams.
1787 (e) Identify and review current methods used to scam a
1788 consumer through payment platforms.
1789 (f) Determine a strategy for education programs that
1790 better equip consumers to identify, avoid, and report payment
1791 scam attempts to the appropriate authorities.
1792 (g) Identify strategies to ensure perpetrators of payment
1793 scams can be identified and pursued by law enforcement.
1794 (h) Consult with other relevant stakeholders, including
1795 federal, state, local, and tribal agencies and financial
1796 services providers.
1797 (i) Determine whether any additional legislation would be
1798 beneficial for law enforcement in mitigating payment scams.
1799 (j) Identify potential solutions to payment scams
1800 involving business e-mail compromise.
Page 72 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1801 (2) By February 1, 2027, the Department of Law Enforcement
1802 shall submit to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of
1803 the House of Representatives and make publicly available online
1804 a report detailing all of the following:
1805 (a) The results of the study under subsection (1).
1806 (b) Any legislative or regulatory recommendations that
1807 would enhance the ability to detect and prevent payment scams.
1808 (c) Recommendations to enhance cooperation among federal,
1809 state, local, and tribal authorities in the investigation and
1810 prosecution of scams, including harmonizing data collection,
1811 improving reporting mechanisms and streams, estimating the
1812 number of complaints and consumers affected, and evaluating the
1813 effectiveness of anti-scam training programs.
1814 (3) This section expires July 1, 2027.
1815 Section 52. In order to implement appropriations used to
1816 pay existing lease contracts for private lease space in excess
1817 of 2,000 square feet in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations
1818 Act, the Department of Management Services, with the cooperation
1819 of the agencies having the existing lease contracts for office
1820 or storage space, shall use tenant broker services to
1821 renegotiate or reprocure all private lease agreements for office
1822 or storage space which are expiring between July 1, 2027, and
1823 June 30, 2029, in order to reduce costs in future years. The
1824 department shall incorporate this initiative into its 2026
1825 master leasing report required under s. 255.249(7), Florida
Page 73 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1826 Statutes, and may use tenant broker services to explore the
1827 possibilities of collocating office or storage space, to review
1828 the space needs of each agency, and to review the length and
1829 terms of potential renewals or renegotiations. The department
1830 shall provide a report to the Executive Office of the Governor,
1831 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
1832 Representatives by November 1, 2026, which lists each lease
1833 contract for private office or storage space, the status of
1834 renegotiations, and the savings achieved. This section expires
1835 July 1, 2027.
1836 Section 53. In order to implement appropriations
1837 authorized in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for data
1838 center services, and notwithstanding s. 216.292(2)(a), Florida
1839 Statutes, an agency may not transfer funds from a data
1840 processing category to a category other than another data
1841 processing category or a cloud computing category for
1842 information technology resources hosted outside an agency. This
1843 section expires July 1, 2027.
1844 Section 54. In order to implement the appropriation of
1845 funds in the appropriation category "Special Categories-Risk
1846 Management Insurance" in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations
1847 Act, and pursuant to the notice, review, and objection
1848 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, the Executive Office
1849 of the Governor may transfer funds appropriated in that category
1850 between departments in order to align the budget authority
Page 74 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1851 granted with the premiums paid by each department for risk
1852 management insurance. This section expires July 1, 2027.
1853 Section 55. In order to implement the appropriation of
1854 funds in the appropriation category "Special Categories-Transfer
1855 to Department of Management Services-Human Resources Services
1856 Purchased per Statewide Contract" in the 2026-2027 General
1857 Appropriations Act, and pursuant to the notice, review, and
1858 objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, the
1859 Executive Office of the Governor may transfer funds appropriated
1860 in that category between departments in order to align the
1861 budget authority granted with the assessments that must be paid
1862 by each agency to the Department of Management Services for
1863 human resource management services. This section expires July 1,
1864 2027.
1865 Section 56. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
1866 2935 in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act in the Building
1867 Relocation appropriation category from the Architects Incidental
1868 Trust Fund of the Department of Management Services, and in
1869 accordance with s. 215.196, Florida Statutes:
1870 (1) Upon the final disposition of a state-owned building,
1871 the Department of Management Services may use up to 5 percent of
1872 facility disposition funds from the Architects Incidental Trust
1873 Fund to defer, offset, or otherwise pay for all or a portion of
1874 relocation expenses, including furniture, fixtures, and
1875 equipment for state agencies impacted by the disposition of the
Page 75 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1876 department's managed facilities in the Florida Facilities Pool.
1877 The extent of the financial assistance provided to impacted
1878 state agencies shall be determined by the department.
1879 (2) The Department of Management Services may submit
1880 budget amendments for an increase in appropriation if necessary
1881 for the implementation of this section pursuant to chapter 216,
1882 Florida Statutes. Budget amendments for an increase in
1883 appropriation shall include a detailed plan providing all
1884 estimated costs and relocation proposals.
1885 (3) This section expires July 1, 2027.
1886 Section 57. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
1887 2514 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act:
1888 (1) The Department of Financial Services shall replace the
1889 four main components of the Florida Accounting Information
1890 Resource Subsystem (FLAIR), which include central FLAIR,
1891 departmental FLAIR, payroll, and information warehouse, and
1892 shall replace the cash management and accounting management
1893 components of the Cash Management Subsystem (CMS) with an
1894 integrated enterprise system that allows the state to organize,
1895 define, and standardize its financial management business
1896 processes and that complies with ss. 215.90-215.96, Florida
1897 Statutes. The department may not include in the replacement of
1898 FLAIR and CMS:
1899 (a) Functionality that duplicates any of the other
1900 information subsystems of the Florida Financial Management
Page 76 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1901 Information System; or
1902 (b) Agency business processes related to any of the
1903 functions included in the Personnel Information System, the
1904 Purchasing Subsystem, or the Legislative Appropriations
1905 System/Planning and Budgeting Subsystem.
1906 (2) For purposes of replacing FLAIR and CMS, the
1907 Department of Financial Services shall:
1908 (a) Take into consideration the cost and implementation
1909 data identified for Option 3 as recommended in the March 31,
1910 2014, Florida Department of Financial Services FLAIR Study,
1911 version 031.
1912 (b) Ensure that all business requirements and technical
1913 specifications have been provided to all state agencies for
1914 their review and input and approved by the executive steering
1915 committee established in paragraph (c), including any updates to
1916 these documents.
1917 (c) Implement a project governance structure that includes
1918 an executive steering committee composed of:
1919 1. The Chief Financial Officer or the executive sponsor of
1920 the project.
1921 2. A representative of the Division of Treasury of the
1922 Department of Financial Services, appointed by the Chief
1923 Financial Officer.
1924 3. The Chief Information Officers of the Department of
1925 Financial Services and the Department of Environmental
Page 77 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1926 Protection.
1927 4. Two employees from the Division of Accounting and
1928 Auditing of the Department of Financial Services, appointed by
1929 the Chief Financial Officer. Each employee must have experience
1930 relating to at least one of the four main components that
1931 compose FLAIR.
1932 5. Two employees from the Executive Office of the
1933 Governor, appointed by the Governor. One employee must have
1934 experience relating to the Legislative Appropriations
1935 System/Planning and Budgeting Subsystem.
1936 6. One employee from the Department of Revenue, appointed
1937 by the executive director, who has experience using or
1938 maintaining the department's finance and accounting systems.
1939 7. Two employees from the Department of Management
1940 Services, appointed by the Secretary of Management Services. One
1941 employee must have experience relating to the department's
1942 personnel information subsystem and one employee must have
1943 experience relating to the department's purchasing subsystem.
1944 8. A state agency administrative services director,
1945 appointed by the Governor.
1946 9. The executive sponsor of the Florida Health Care
1947 Connection (FX) System or his or her designee, appointed by the
1948 Secretary of Health Care Administration.
1949 10. The State Chief Information Officer, or his or her
1950 designee, as a nonvoting member. The State Chief Information
Page 78 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1951 Officer, or his or her designee, shall provide monthly status
1952 reports to the executive steering committee pursuant to the
1953 oversight responsibilities in s. 282.0051, Florida Statutes.
1954 11. One employee from the Department of Business and
1955 Professional Regulation who has experience in finance and
1956 accounting and FLAIR, appointed by the Secretary of Business and
1957 Professional Regulation.
1958 12. One employee from the Florida Fish and Wildlife
1959 Conservation Commission who has experience using or maintaining
1960 the commission's finance and accounting systems, appointed by
1961 the Chair of the Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation
1962 Commission.
1963 13. The budget director of the Department of Education, or
1964 his or her designee.
1965 (3)(a) The Chief Financial Officer or the executive
1966 sponsor of the project shall serve as chair of the executive
1967 steering committee, and the committee shall take action by a
1968 vote of at least eight affirmative votes with the Chief
1969 Financial Officer or the executive sponsor of the project voting
1970 on the prevailing side. A quorum of the executive steering
1971 committee composed of at least 10 members.
1972 (b) No later than 14 days before a meeting of the
1973 executive steering committee, the chair shall request input from
1974 committee members on agenda items for the next scheduled
1975 meeting.
Page 79 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
1976 (c) The chair shall establish a working group composed of
1977 FLAIR users, state agency technical staff who maintain
1978 applications that integrate with FLAIR, and no less than four
1979 state agency finance and accounting or budget directors. The
1980 working group shall meet at least monthly to review PALM
1981 functionality, assess project impacts to state financial
1982 business processes and agency staff, and develop recommendations
1983 to the executive steering committee for improvements. The chair
1984 shall request input from the working group on agenda items for
1985 each scheduled meeting. The PALM project team shall dedicate a
1986 staff member to the group and provide system demonstrations and
1987 any project documentation, as needed, for the group to fulfill
1988 its duties.
1989 (d) The chair shall request all agency project sponsors to
1990 provide bimonthly status reports to the executive steering
1991 committee. The form and format of the bimonthly status reports
1992 shall be developed by the Florida PALM project and provided to
1993 the executive steering committee meeting for approval. Such
1994 agency status reports shall provide information to the executive
1995 steering committee on the activities and ongoing work within the
1996 agency to prepare their systems and impacted employees for the
1997 deployment of the Florida PALM System. The first bimonthly
1998 status report is due September 1, 2026, and bimonthly
1999 thereafter.
2000 (4) The executive steering committee has the overall
Page 80 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2001 responsibility for ensuring that the project to replace FLAIR
2002 and CMS meets its primary business objectives and shall:
2003 (a) Identify and recommend to the Executive Office of the
2004 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
2005 House of Representatives any statutory changes needed to
2006 implement the replacement subsystem that will standardize, to
2007 the fullest extent possible, the state's financial management
2008 business processes.
2009 (b) Review and approve any changes to the project's scope,
2010 schedule, and budget which do not conflict with the requirements
2011 of subsection (1).
2012 (c) Ensure that adequate resources are provided throughout
2013 all phases of the project.
2014 (d) Approve all major project deliverables and any cost
2015 changes to each deliverable over $250,000.
2016 (e) Approve contract amendments and changes to all
2017 contract-related documents associated with the replacement of
2018 FLAIR and CMS.
2019 (f) Review, and approve as warranted, the format of the
2020 bimonthly agency status reports to include objective and
2021 quantifiable information on each agency's progress in planning
2022 for the Florida PALM Major Implementation, covering the agency's
2023 people, processes, technology, and data transformation
2024 activities.
2025 (g) Ensure compliance with ss. 216.181(16), 216.311,
Page 81 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2026 216.313, 282.318(4)(h), and 287.058, Florida Statutes.
2027 (5) This section expires July 1, 2027.
2028 Section 58. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2029 3040 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
2030 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 65 of chapter
2031 2025-199, Laws of Florida, subsection (3) of section 282.709,
2032 Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
2033 282.709 State agency law enforcement radio system and
2034 interoperability network.—
2035 (3) In recognition of the critical nature of the statewide
2036 law enforcement radio communications system, the Legislature
2037 finds that there is an immediate danger to the public health,
2038 safety, and welfare, and that it is in the best interest of the
2039 state to continue partnering with the system's current operator.
2040 The Legislature finds that continuity of coverage is critical to
2041 supporting law enforcement, first responders, and other public
2042 safety users. The potential for a loss in coverage or a lack of
2043 interoperability between users requires emergency action and is
2044 a serious concern for officers' safety and their ability to
2045 communicate and respond to various disasters and events.
2046 (a) The department, pursuant to s. 287.057(11), shall
2047 enter into a 15-year contract with the entity that was operating
2048 the statewide radio communications system on January 1, 2021.
2049 The contract must include:
2050 1. The purchase of radios;
Page 82 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2051 2. The upgrade to the Project 25 communications standard;
2052 3. Increased system capacity and enhanced coverage for
2053 system users;
2054 4. Operations, maintenance, and support at a fixed annual
2055 rate;
2056 5. The conveyance of communications towers to the
2057 department; and
2058 6. The assignment of communications tower leases to the
2059 department.
2060 (b) The State Agency Law Enforcement Radio System Trust
2061 Fund is established in the department and funded from surcharges
2062 collected under ss. 318.18, 320.0802, and 328.72. Upon
2063 appropriation, moneys in the trust fund may be used by the
2064 department to acquire the equipment, software, and engineering,
2065 administrative, and maintenance services it needs to construct,
2066 operate, and maintain the statewide radio system. Moneys in the
2067 trust fund from surcharges shall be used to help fund the costs
2068 of the system. Upon completion of the system, moneys in the
2069 trust fund may also be used by the department for payment of the
2070 recurring maintenance costs of the system.
2071 Section 59. The text of s. 282.709(3), Florida Statutes,
2072 as carried forward from chapter 2021-37, Laws of Florida, by
2073 this act, expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that subsection,
2074 shall revert to that in existence on June 1, 2021, except that
2075 any amendments to such text enacted other than by this act,
Page 83 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2076 shall be preserved and continue to operate to the extent that
2077 such amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text
2078 which expire pursuant to this section.
2079 Section 60. In order to implement appropriations relating
2080 to the purchase of equipment and services related to the
2081 Statewide Law Enforcement Radio System (SLERS) as authorized in
2082 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding s.
2083 287.057, Florida Statutes, state agencies and other eligible
2084 users of the SLERS network may use the Department of Management
2085 Services SLERS contract for purchase of equipment and services.
2086 This section expires July 1, 2027.
2087 Section 61. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
2088 2954 through 2965 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
2089 and notwithstanding rule 60A-1.031, Florida Administrative Code,
2090 the transaction fee as identified in s. 287.057(24)(c), Florida
2091 Statutes, shall be collected for use of the online procurement
2092 system and is 0.7 percent for the 2026-2027 fiscal year only.
2093 This section expires July 1, 2027.
2094 Section 62. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
2095 2866 through 2892 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
2096 and upon the expiration and reversion of the amendments made by
2097 section 68 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, paragraph (i)
2098 of subsection (9) of section 24.105, Florida Statutes, is
2099 amended to read:
2100 24.105 Powers and duties of department.—The department
Page 84 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2101 shall:
2102 (9) Adopt rules governing the establishment and operation
2103 of the state lottery, including:
2104 (i) The manner and amount of compensation of retailers,
2105 except for the 2026-2027 fiscal year only, effective July 1,
2106 2026, the commission for lottery ticket sales shall be 6 percent
2107 of the purchase price of each ticket sold or issued as a prize
2108 by a retailer. Any additional retailer compensation is limited
2109 to the Florida Lottery Retailer Bonus Commission program
2110 appropriated in Specific Appropriation 2888 of the 2026-2027
2111 General Appropriations Act.
2112 Section 63. The amendment to s. 24.105(9)(i), Florida
2113 Statutes, made by this act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of
2114 that paragraph shall revert to that in existence on June 30,
2115 2022, except that any amendments to such text enacted other than
2116 by this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the
2117 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions
2118 of text which expire pursuant to this section.
2119 Section 64. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
2120 3084 through 3092 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
2121 paragraph (ll) of subsection (6) of section 627.351, Florida
2122 Statutes, is amended to read:
2123 627.351 Insurance risk apportionment plans.—
2124 (6) CITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.—
2125 (ll)1. In addition to any other method of alternative
Page 85 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2126 dispute resolution authorized by state law, the corporation may
2127 adopt policy forms that provide for the resolution of disputes
2128 regarding its claim determinations, including disputes regarding
2129 coverage for, or the scope and value of, a claim, in a
2130 proceeding before the Division of Administrative Hearings. Any
2131 such policies are not subject to s. 627.70154. All proceedings
2132 in the Division of Administrative Hearings pursuant to such
2133 policies are subject to ss. 57.105 and 768.79 as if filed in the
2134 courts of this state and are not considered chapter 120
2135 administrative proceedings. Rule 1.442, Florida Rules of Civil
2136 Procedure, applies to any offer served pursuant to s. 768.79,
2137 except that, notwithstanding any provision in Rule 1.442,
2138 Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, to the contrary, an offer
2139 shall not be served earlier than 10 days after filing the
2140 request for hearing with the Division of Administrative Hearings
2141 and shall not be served later than 10 days before the date set
2142 for the final hearing. The administrative law judge in such
2143 proceedings shall award attorney fees and other relief pursuant
2144 to ss. 57.105 and 768.79. The corporation may not seek, and the
2145 office may not approve, a maximum hourly rate for attorney fees.
2146 2. The corporation may contract with the division to
2147 conduct proceedings to resolve disputes regarding its claim
2148 determinations as may be provided for in the applicable policies
2149 of insurance. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2150 Section 65. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
Page 86 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2151 2485 through 2492 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
2152 subsection (15) is added to section 112.215, Florida Statutes,
2153 to read:
2154 112.215 Government employees; deferred compensation
2155 program.—
2156 (15) Notwithstanding the requirements in paragraphs (6)(a)
2157 and (b) that deferred compensation not be included in the
2158 employee's taxable income until actually received by the
2159 employee under the terms of the plan, a deferred compensation
2160 plan established pursuant to this section may offer to all
2161 eligible employees a qualified Roth contribution program in
2162 accordance with s. 402A of the Internal Revenue Code. This
2163 subsection expires July 1, 2027.
2164 Section 66. Effective upon this act becoming law, and in
2165 order to implement Specific Appropriations 3006 through 3014 of
2166 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (2) of
2167 section 110.116, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2168 110.116 Personnel information system; payroll procedures.—
2169 (2)(a) In recognition of the critical nature of the
2170 statewide personnel and payroll system commonly known as People
2171 First, the Legislature finds that it is in the best interest of
2172 the state to continue partnering with the current People First
2173 third-party operator. The People First System annually processes
2174 500,000 employment applications, 455,000 personnel actions, and
2175 the state's $9.5-billion payroll. The Legislature finds that the
Page 87 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2176 continuity of operations of the People First System and the
2177 critical functions it provides such as payroll, employee health
2178 insurance benefit records, and other critical services must not
2179 be interrupted. Presently, the Chief Financial Officer is
2180 undertaking the development of a new statewide accounting and
2181 financial management system, commonly known as the Planning,
2182 Accounting, and Ledger Management (PALM) system, scheduled to be
2183 operational in the year 2027. The procurement and implementation
2184 of an entire replacement of the People First System will impede
2185 the timeframe needed to successfully integrate the state's
2186 payroll system with the PALM System. In order to maintain
2187 continuity of operations and to ensure the successful completion
2188 of the PALM System, the Legislature directs that the department:
2189 1. Continue the integration of the current People First
2190 System with PALM.
2191 2. Suspend major functionality updates or changes to the
2192 People First System until the completion of the PALM System.
2193 This does not include:
2194 a. Routine system maintenance such as code updates
2195 following open enrollment; or
2196 b. The technical remediation necessary to integrate the
2197 system with PALM within the PALM project's planned
2198 implementation schedule.
2199 3. Provide technical support for state agencies that may
2200 need assistance in remediating or integrating current financial
Page 88 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2201 shadow systems with People First in order to integrate with PALM
2202 or the cloud version of People First.
2203 4. Develop organizational change management and training
2204 deliverables needed to support the implementation of PALM
2205 payroll functionality and the People First System cloud upgrade.
2206 Responsibilities of the operator and the department shall be
2207 outlined in a project role and responsibility assignment chart
2208 within the contract.
2209 5. Submit project planning and analysis deliverables that
2210 detail the state's current and future state business,
2211 functional, and technical requirements, including, but not
2212 limited to:
2213 a. System capabilities and user requirements;
2214 b. Security, accessibility, and compliance standards;
2215 c. Data migration and conversion requirements;
2216 d. Integration points with existing enterprise systems and
2217 third-party applications; and
2218 e. Verifiable acceptance criteria for each requirement.
2219 6. Conduct a complete system integration assessment to
2220 identify dependencies, interoperability challenges, and
2221 strategies for seamless data exchange.
2222 7. Document a streamlined transparent process to track,
2223 test, and update all system requirements.
2224 8. Estimate the cost of transitioning the current People
2225 First System to a cloud computing infrastructure within the
Page 89 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2226 contract extension and after the successful integration with
2227 PALM. The project cost evaluation shall estimate the annual cost
2228 and capacity growth required to host the system in a cloud
2229 environment.
2230
2231 The department shall develop these project planning resources in
2232 conjunction with all stakeholders.
2233 (b) The department shall submit, no later than October 15,
2234 2026, its project planning and detailed cost estimates to
2235 upgrade the current People First System to the chair of the
2236 Senate Committee on Appropriations, the chair of the House of
2237 Representatives Budget Committee, and the Executive Office of
2238 the Governor's Office of Policy and Budget.
2239 The department shall contract with an independent software
2240 quality assurance and testing provider to work with all
2241 stakeholders to:
2242 1. Conduct a comprehensive business process analysis to
2243 document current workflows, identify inefficiencies, and develop
2244 recommendations to streamline business processes to improve
2245 service delivery, reduce redundancy, and enhance operational
2246 efficiency.
2247 2. Develop detailed current and future state business,
2248 functional, and technical requirements, including, but not
2249 limited to:
2250 a. System capabilities and user requirements;
Page 90 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2251 b. Security, accessibility, and compliance standards;
2252 c. Data migration and conversion requirements;
2253 d. Integration points with existing enterprise systems and
2254 third-party applications; and
2255 e. Verifiable acceptance criteria for each requirement.
2256 3. Conduct a complete system integration assessment to
2257 identify dependencies, interoperability challenges, and
2258 strategies for seamless data exchange.
2259 4. Deliver a streamlined transparent process to track,
2260 test, and update all system requirements.
2261 5. Submit a report detailing these requirements, process
2262 improvements, and any related statutory change recommendations
2263 to the chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair
2264 of the House Budget Committee, and the Executive Office of the
2265 Governor's Office of Policy and Budget by June 30, 2026.
2266 (c)(b) This subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2267 Section 67. In order to implement Section 100 of the 2026-
2268 2027 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (a) of subsection (2)
2269 of section 215.5586, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2270 215.5586 My Safe Florida Home Program.—There is
2271 established within the Department of Financial Services the My
2272 Safe Florida Home Program. The department shall provide fiscal
2273 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership
2274 for the program, consistent with this section. This section does
2275 not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the
Page 91 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2276 state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of
2277 residential property in this state. Implementation of this
2278 program is subject to annual legislative appropriations. It is
2279 the intent of the Legislature that, subject to the availability
2280 of funds, the My Safe Florida Home Program provide licensed
2281 inspectors to perform hurricane mitigation inspections of
2282 eligible homes and grants to fund hurricane mitigation projects
2283 on those homes. The department shall implement the program in
2284 such a manner that the total amount of funding requested by
2285 accepted applications, whether for inspections, grants, or other
2286 services or assistance, does not exceed the total amount of
2287 available funds. If, after applications are processed and
2288 approved, funds remain available, the department may accept
2289 applications up to the available amount. The program shall
2290 develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach
2291 for hurricane damage mitigation pursuant to the requirements
2292 provided in this section.
2293 (2) HURRICANE MITIGATION GRANTS.—Financial grants shall be
2294 used by homeowners to make improvements recommended by an
2295 inspection which increase resistance to hurricane damage.
2296 (a) A homeowner is eligible for a hurricane mitigation
2297 grant if all of the following criteria are met:
2298 1. The home must be eligible for an inspection under
2299 subsection (1).
2300 2. The home must be a dwelling with an insured value of
Page 92 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2301 $700,000 or less. Homeowners who are low-income persons, as
2302 defined in s. 420.0004(11), are exempt from this requirement.
2303 3. The home must undergo an acceptable hurricane
2304 mitigation inspection as provided in subsection (1).
2305 4. The building permit application for initial
2306 construction of the home must have been made before January 1,
2307 2008.
2308 5. The homeowner must agree to make his or her home
2309 available for inspection once a mitigation project is completed.
2310 6. The homeowner must agree to provide to the department
2311 information received from the homeowner's insurer identifying
2312 the discounts realized by the homeowner because of the
2313 mitigation improvements funded through the program.
2314 7.a. The homeowner must be a low-income person or
2315 moderate-income person as defined in s. 420.0004.
2316 b. The hurricane mitigation inspection must have occurred
2317 within the previous 24 months from the date of application.
2318 c. Notwithstanding subparagraph 2., homeowners who are
2319 low-income persons, as defined in s. 420.0004(11), are not
2320 exempt from the requirement that the home must be a dwelling
2321 with an insured value of $700,000 or less.
2322 d. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2323 Section 68. Effective upon this act becoming a law, in
2324 order to implement Specific Appropriation 2544A of the 2026-2027
2325 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding s. 216.301,
Page 93 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2326 Florida Statutes, the funds appropriated to the Department of
2327 Financial Services in Specific Appropriation 2245A of the 2025-
2328 2026 General Appropriations Act and the unexpended balance of
2329 funds carried forward pursuant to s. 74, of chapter 2025-199,
2330 Laws of Florida, shall not revert and may be carried forward
2331 through the 2026-2027 fiscal year. This section expires July 1,
2332 2027.
2333 Section 69. In order to implement the appropriation of
2334 funds in the appropriation category "Northwest Regional Data
2335 Center" in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
2336 pursuant to the notice, review, and objection procedures of s.
2337 216.177, Florida Statutes, the Executive Office of the Governor
2338 may transfer funds appropriated in that category between
2339 departments in order to align the budget authority granted based
2340 on the estimated costs for data processing services for the
2341 2026-2027 fiscal year. This section expires July 1, 2027.
2342 Section 70. In order to implement appropriations
2343 authorized in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for state
2344 data center services, auxiliary assessments charged to state
2345 agencies related to contract management services provided to
2346 Northwest Regional Data Center may not exceed 3 percent. This
2347 section expires July 1, 2027.
2348 Section 71. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2349 2563A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, section
2350 284.51, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 94 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2351 284.51 Electroencephalogram combined transcranial magnetic
2352 stimulation treatment pilot program.—
2353 (1) As used in this section, the term:
2354 (a) "Division" means the Division of Risk Management of
2355 the Department of Financial Services.
2356 (b) "Electroencephalogram combined Transcranial Magnetic
2357 Stimulation" or "eTMS" means treatment in which transcranial
2358 magnetic stimulation frequency pulses are tuned to the patient's
2359 physiology and biometric data.
2360 (c) "First responder" means a law enforcement officer, a
2361 part-time law enforcement officer, or an auxiliary law
2362 enforcement officer as defined in s. 943.10; a firefighter as
2363 defined in s. 633.102; a 911 public safety telecommunicator as
2364 defined in s. 401.465; or an emergency medical technician or
2365 paramedic as defined in s. 401.23 employed by state or local
2366 government. The term also includes a volunteer or retired law
2367 enforcement officer, firefighter, or emergency medical
2368 technician or paramedic engaged, or previously engaged, by the
2369 state or a local government.
2370 (d) "Veteran" means:
2371 1. A veteran as defined in 38 U.S.C. s. 101(2);
2372 2. A person who served in a reserve component as defined
2373 in 38 U.S.C. s. 101(27); or
2374 3. A person who served in the National Guard of any state.
2375 (2) The division shall select a provider to establish a
Page 95 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2376 statewide pilot program to make eTMS available for veterans,
2377 first responders, and immediate family members of veterans and
2378 first responders with:
2379 (a) Substance use disorders.
2380 (b) Mental illness.
2381 (c) Sleep disorders.
2382 (d) Traumatic brain injuries.
2383 (e) Sexual trauma.
2384 (f) Posttraumatic stress disorder and accompanying
2385 comorbidities.
2386 (g) Concussions.
2387 (h) Other brain trauma.
2388 (i) Quality of life issues affecting human performance,
2389 including issues related to or resulting from problems with
2390 cognition and problems maintaining attention, concentration, or
2391 focus.
2392 (3) The provider must display a history of serving veteran
2393 and first responder populations at a statewide level. The
2394 provider shall establish a network for in-person and offsite
2395 care with the goal of providing statewide access. Consideration
2396 shall be provided to locations with a large population of first
2397 responders and veterans. In addition to traditional eTMS
2398 devices, the provider may utilize nonmedical Portable Magnetic
2399 Stimulation devices to improve access to underserved populations
2400 in remote areas or to be used to serve as a pre-post treatment
Page 96 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2401 or a stand-alone device. The provider shall be required to
2402 establish and operate a clinical practice and to evaluate
2403 outcomes of such clinical practice.
2404 (4) The pilot program shall include:
2405 (a) The establishment of a peer-to-peer support network by
2406 the provider made available to all individuals receiving
2407 treatment under the program.
2408 (b) The requirement that each individual who receives
2409 treatment under the program also must receive neurophysiological
2410 monitoring, monitoring for symptoms of substance use and other
2411 mental health disorders, and access to counseling and wellness
2412 programming. Each individual who receives treatment must also
2413 participate in the peer-to-peer support network established by
2414 the provider.
2415 (c) The establishment of protocols which include the use
2416 of adopted stimulation frequency and intensity modulation based
2417 on EEGs done on days 0, 10, and 20 and motor threshold testing,
2418 as well as clinical symptoms, signs, and biometrics.
2419 (d) The requirement that protocols and outcomes of any
2420 treatment provided by the clinical practice shall be collected
2421 and reported by the provider quarterly to the division, the
2422 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
2423 Representatives. Such report shall include the biodata metrics
2424 and all expenditures and accounting of the use of funds received
2425 from the department.
Page 97 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2426 (e) The requirement that protocols and outcomes of any
2427 treatment provided by the clinical practice shall be collected
2428 and reported to the University of South Florida and may be
2429 provided by the provider to any relevant Food and Drug
2430 Administration studies or trials.
2431 (5) The division may adopt rules to implement this
2432 section.
2433 (6) This section expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2434 Section 72. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2435 2563A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the
2436 Department of Financial Services shall continue the
2437 Electroencephalogram Combined Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation
2438 Treatment pilot program for veterans and first responders. The
2439 department's existing contract, and all funds paid by the
2440 department pursuant to that contract, do not constitute state
2441 financial assistance as provided in s. 215.97, Florida Statutes.
2442 The department shall amend the existing contract, as needed, to
2443 clarify that funds paid pursuant to the contract do not
2444 constitute state financial assistance. This section expires July
2445 1, 2027.
2446 Section 73. Effective upon this act becoming a law, and in
2447 order to implement Specific Appropriations 2505 through 2512 of
2448 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (3) is
2449 added to section 717.123, Florida Statutes, to read:
2450 717.123 Deposit of funds.—
Page 98 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2451 (3) In order to address the unintended spike in securities
2452 receipts received by the department under this chapter as a
2453 result of the implementation of chapter 2024-140, Laws of
2454 Florida, the department shall segregate in a separate account an
2455 amount that does not exceed the estimated atypical receipts for
2456 fiscal years 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 as identified by the
2457 Revenue Estimating Conference in its most recently adopted
2458 official forecast. This amount must be held in a separate
2459 account for the payment of claims associated with such receipts
2460 as allowed by the department. In addition to the $15 million the
2461 department is authorized to retain pursuant to subsection (1)
2462 and notwithstanding subsection (1), for the 2025-2026 and 2026-
2463 2027 fiscal years only, the department shall retain any
2464 remaining funds held in the separate account. This subsection
2465 expires July 1, 2027.
2466 Section 74. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2467 1660 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
2468 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the
2469 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may submit
2470 budget amendments, subject to the notice, review, and objection
2471 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget
2472 authority to support the National School Lunch Program. This
2473 section expires July 1, 2027.
2474 Section 75. In order to implement specific appropriations
2475 from the land acquisition trust funds within the Department of
Page 99 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2476 Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Department of
2477 Environmental Protection, the Department of State, and the Fish
2478 and Wildlife Conservation Commission, which are contained in the
2479 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (3) of section
2480 215.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2481 215.18 Transfers between funds; limitation.—
2482 (3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) and only with respect
2483 to a land acquisition trust fund in the Department of
2484 Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Department of
2485 Environmental Protection, the Department of State, or the Fish
2486 and Wildlife Conservation Commission, whenever there is a
2487 deficiency in a land acquisition trust fund which would render
2488 that trust fund temporarily insufficient to meet its just
2489 requirements, including the timely payment of appropriations
2490 from that trust fund, and other trust funds in the State
2491 Treasury have moneys that are for the time being or otherwise in
2492 excess of the amounts necessary to meet the just requirements,
2493 including appropriated obligations, of those other trust funds,
2494 the Governor may order a temporary transfer of moneys from one
2495 or more of the other trust funds to a land acquisition trust
2496 fund in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the
2497 Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of State,
2498 or the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission. Any action
2499 proposed pursuant to this subsection is subject to the notice,
2500 review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, and the Governor
Page 100 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2501 shall provide notice of such action at least 7 days before the
2502 effective date of the transfer of trust funds, except that
2503 during July 2026 2025, notice of such action shall be provided
2504 at least 3 days before the effective date of a transfer unless
2505 such 3-day notice is waived by the chair and vice chair of the
2506 Legislative Budget Commission. Any transfer of trust funds to a
2507 land acquisition trust fund in the Department of Agriculture and
2508 Consumer Services, the Department of Environmental Protection,
2509 the Department of State, or the Fish and Wildlife Conservation
2510 Commission must be repaid to the trust funds from which the
2511 moneys were loaned by the end of the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal
2512 year. The Legislature has determined that the repayment of the
2513 other trust fund moneys temporarily loaned to a land acquisition
2514 trust fund in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer
2515 Services, the Department of Environmental Protection, the
2516 Department of State, or the Fish and Wildlife Conservation
2517 Commission pursuant to this subsection is an allowable use of
2518 the moneys in a land acquisition trust fund because the moneys
2519 from other trust funds temporarily loaned to a land acquisition
2520 trust fund shall be expended solely and exclusively in
2521 accordance with s. 28, Art. X of the State Constitution. This
2522 subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2523 Section 76. (1) In order to implement specific
2524 appropriations from the land acquisition trust funds within the
2525 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Department
Page 101 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2526 of Environmental Protection, the Department of State, and the
2527 Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission which are contained in
2528 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the Department of
2529 Environmental Protection shall transfer revenues from the Land
2530 Acquisition Trust Fund within the department to the land
2531 acquisition trust funds within the Department of Agriculture and
2532 Consumer Services, the Department of State, and the Fish and
2533 Wildlife Conservation Commission as provided in this section. As
2534 used in this section, the term "department" means the Department
2535 of Environmental Protection.
2536 (2) After subtracting any required debt service payments,
2537 the proportionate share of revenues to be transferred to each
2538 land acquisition trust fund shall be calculated by dividing the
2539 appropriations from each of the land acquisition trust funds for
2540 the fiscal year by the total appropriations from the Land
2541 Acquisition Trust Fund within the department and the land
2542 acquisition trust funds within the Department of Agriculture and
2543 Consumer Services, the Department of State, and the Fish and
2544 Wildlife Conservation Commission for the fiscal year. The
2545 department shall transfer the proportionate share of the
2546 revenues in the Land Acquisition Trust Fund within the
2547 department on a monthly basis to the appropriate land
2548 acquisition trust funds within the Department of Agriculture and
2549 Consumer Services, the Department of State, and the Fish and
2550 Wildlife Conservation Commission and shall retain its
Page 102 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2551 proportionate share of the revenues in the Land Acquisition
2552 Trust Fund within the department. Total distributions to a land
2553 acquisition trust fund within the Department of Agriculture and
2554 Consumer Services, the Department of State, and the Fish and
2555 Wildlife Conservation Commission may not exceed the total
2556 appropriations from such trust fund for the fiscal year.
2557 (3) In addition, the department shall transfer from the
2558 Land Acquisition Trust Fund to land acquisition trust funds
2559 within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the
2560 Department of State, and the Fish and Wildlife Conservation
2561 Commission amounts equal to the difference between the amounts
2562 appropriated in chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, to the
2563 department's Land Acquisition Trust Fund and the other land
2564 acquisition trust funds, and the amounts actually transferred
2565 between those trust funds during the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
2566 (4) The department may advance funds from the beginning
2567 unobligated fund balance in the Land Acquisition Trust Fund to
2568 the Land Acquisition Trust Fund within the Fish and Wildlife
2569 Conservation Commission needed for cash flow purposes based on a
2570 detailed expenditure plan. The department shall prorate amounts
2571 transferred quarterly to the Fish and Wildlife Conservation
2572 Commission to recoup the amount of funds advanced by June 30,
2573 2026.
2574 (5) This section expires July 1, 2027.
2575 Section 77. In order to implement section 92 of the 2026-
Page 103 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2576 2027 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (a) of subsection (2)
2577 of section 376.91, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2578 376.91 Statewide cleanup of perfluoroalkyl and
2579 polyfluoroalkyl substances.—
2580 (2) STATEWIDE CLEANUP TARGET LEVELS.—
2581 (a) If the United States Environmental Protection Agency
2582 has not finalized its standards for PFAS in drinking water,
2583 groundwater, and soil by January 1, 2027 2026, the department
2584 shall adopt by rule statewide cleanup target levels for PFAS in
2585 drinking water, groundwater, and soil using criteria set forth
2586 in s. 376.30701, with priority given to PFOA and PFOS. The rules
2587 for statewide cleanup target levels may not take effect until
2588 ratified by the Legislature.
2589 Section 78. The amendments to s. 376.91(2)(a), Florida
2590 Statutes, made by this act expire July 1, 2027, and the text of
2591 that paragraph shall revert to that in existence on June 30,
2592 2026, except that any amendments to such text enacted other than
2593 by this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the
2594 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions
2595 of text which expire pursuant to this section.
2596 Section 79. In order to implement section 92 of the 2026-
2597 2027 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (i) of subsection
2598 (13) of section 376.3071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2599 376.3071 Inland Protection Trust Fund; creation; purposes;
2600 funding.—
Page 104 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2601 (13) PETROLEUM CLEANUP PARTICIPATION PROGRAM.—To encourage
2602 detection, reporting, and cleanup of contamination caused by
2603 discharges of petroleum or petroleum products, the department
2604 shall, within the guidelines established in this subsection,
2605 implement a cleanup program to provide rehabilitation funding
2606 assistance for all property contaminated by discharges of
2607 petroleum or petroleum products from a petroleum storage system
2608 occurring before January 1, 1995. Eligibility is subject to an
2609 annual appropriation from the fund. Additionally, funding for
2610 eligible sites is contingent upon annual appropriation in
2611 subsequent years. Such continued state funding is not an
2612 entitlement or a vested right under this subsection. Eligibility
2613 shall be determined in the program, notwithstanding any other
2614 provision of law, consent order, order, judgment, or ordinance
2615 to the contrary.
2616 (i) Notwithstanding this section, for the 2026-2027 2025-
2617 2026 fiscal year, program deductibles and copayments may not be
2618 assessed, monetary caps may not be enforced, and all costs for
2619 activities described in this subsection must be absorbed at the
2620 expense of the Inland Protection Trust Fund, without recourse to
2621 reimbursement or recovery, with the following exceptions:
2622 1. This paragraph does not apply to a site where the
2623 department has been denied site access to implement this
2624 section.
2625 2. This paragraph does not authorize or require
Page 105 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2626 reimbursement from the fund for costs expended before the
2627 beginning of the grace period.
2628 3. Upon discovery by the department that the owner or
2629 operator of a petroleum storage system has been grossly
2630 negligent in the maintenance of such petroleum storage system;
2631 has, with willful intent to conceal the existence of a serious
2632 discharge, falsified inventory or reconciliation records
2633 maintained with respect to the site at which such system is
2634 located; or has intentionally damaged such petroleum storage
2635 system, the site at which such system is located is ineligible
2636 for participation in the incentive program and the owner is
2637 liable for all costs due to discharges from petroleum storage
2638 systems at that site.
2639
2640 This paragraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2641 Section 80. In order to implement section 92 of the 2026-
2642 2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (5) of section
2643 376.3072, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2644 376.3072 Florida Petroleum Liability and Restoration
2645 Insurance Program.—
2646 (5) Notwithstanding subsections (1)-(4), for the 2026-2027
2647 2025-2026 fiscal year, program deductibles or copayments may not
2648 be assessed, monetary caps may not be enforced, and all costs
2649 for activities described in this section must be absorbed at the
2650 expense of the Inland Protection Trust Fund, without recourse to
Page 106 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2651 reimbursement or recovery, with the following exceptions:
2652 (a) This subsection does not apply to a site where the
2653 department has been denied site access to implement this
2654 section.
2655 (b) This subsection does not authorize or require
2656 reimbursement from the fund for costs expended before the
2657 beginning of the grace period.
2658 (c) Upon discovery by the department that the owner or
2659 operator of a petroleum storage system has been grossly
2660 negligent in the maintenance of such petroleum storage system;
2661 has, with willful intent to conceal the existence of a serious
2662 discharge, falsified inventory or reconciliation records
2663 maintained with respect to the site at which such system is
2664 located; or has intentionally damaged such petroleum storage
2665 system, the site at which such system is located is ineligible
2666 for participation in the incentive program and the owner is
2667 liable for all costs due to discharges from petroleum storage
2668 systems at that site.
2669
2670 This subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2671 Section 81. In order to implement section 92 of the 2026-
2672 2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding the
2673 expiration date in section 89 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of
2674 Florida, paragraph (g) of subsection (15) of section 376.3071,
2675 Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
Page 107 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2676 376.3071 Inland Protection Trust Fund; creation; purposes;
2677 funding.—
2678 (15) ETHANOL OR BIODIESEL DAMAGE; PREVENTIVE MEASURES.—The
2679 department shall pay, pursuant to this subsection, up to $10
2680 million each fiscal year from the fund for the costs of labor
2681 and equipment to repair or replace petroleum storage systems
2682 that may have been damaged due to the storage of fuels blended
2683 with ethanol or biodiesel, or for preventive measures to reduce
2684 the potential for such damage.
2685 (g) Payments may not be made for the following:
2686 1. Proposal costs or costs related to preparation of the
2687 application and required documentation;
2688 2. Certified public accountant costs;
2689 3. Except as provided in paragraph (j), any costs in
2690 excess of the amount approved by the department under paragraph
2691 (b) or which are not in substantial compliance with the purchase
2692 order;
2693 4. Costs associated with storage tanks, piping, or
2694 ancillary equipment that has previously been repaired or
2695 replaced for which costs have been paid under this section;
2696 5. Facilities that are not in compliance with department
2697 storage tank rules, until the noncompliance issues have been
2698 resolved; or
2699 6. Costs associated with damage to petroleum storage
2700 systems caused in whole or in part by causes other than the
Page 108 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2701 storage of fuels blended with ethanol or biodiesel.
2702 Section 82. The text of s. 376.3071(15)(g), Florida
2703 Statutes, as carried forward from chapter 2020-114, Laws of
2704 Florida, by this act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that
2705 paragraph shall revert to that in existence on July 1, 2020, but
2706 not including any amendments made by this act or chapter 2020-
2707 114, Laws of Florida, and any amendments to such text enacted
2708 other than by this act shall be preserved and continue to
2709 operate to the extent that such amendments are not dependent
2710 upon the portion of text which expires pursuant to this section.
2711 Section 83. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2712 1715 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
2713 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 92 of chapter
2714 2025-199, Laws of Florida, section 380.5105, Florida Statutes,
2715 is reenacted to read:
2716 380.5105 The Stan Mayfield Working Waterfronts; Florida
2717 Forever program.—
2718 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
2719 it is the intent of the Legislature that the trust shall
2720 administer the working waterfronts land acquisition program as
2721 set forth in this section.
2722 (a) The trust and the Department of Agriculture and
2723 Consumer Services shall jointly develop rules specifically
2724 establishing an application process and a process for the
2725 evaluation, scoring and ranking of working waterfront projects.
Page 109 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2726 The proposed rules jointly developed pursuant to this paragraph
2727 shall be promulgated by the trust. Such rules shall establish a
2728 system of weighted criteria to give increased priority to
2729 projects:
2730 1. Within a municipality with a population less than
2731 30,000;
2732 2. Within a municipality or area under intense growth and
2733 development pressures, as evidenced by a number of factors,
2734 including a determination that the municipality's growth rate
2735 exceeds the average growth rate for the state;
2736 3. Within the boundary of a community redevelopment agency
2737 established pursuant to s. 163.356;
2738 4. Adjacent to state-owned submerged lands designated as
2739 an aquatic preserve identified in s. 258.39; or
2740 5. That provide a demonstrable benefit to the local
2741 economy.
2742 (b) For projects that will require more than the grant
2743 amount awarded for completion, the applicant must identify in
2744 their project application funding sources that will provide the
2745 difference between the grant award and the estimated project
2746 completion cost. Such rules may be incorporated into those
2747 developed pursuant to s. 380.507(11).
2748 (c) The trust shall develop a ranking list based on
2749 criteria identified in paragraph (a) for proposed fee simple and
2750 less-than-fee simple acquisition projects developed pursuant to
Page 110 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2751 this section. The trust shall, by the first Board of Trustees of
2752 the Internal Improvement Trust Fund meeting in February, present
2753 the ranking list pursuant to this section to the board of
2754 trustees for final approval of projects for funding. The board
2755 of trustees may remove projects from the ranking list but may
2756 not add projects.
2757 (d) Grant awards, acquisition approvals, and terms of
2758 less-than-fee acquisitions shall be approved by the trust.
2759 Waterfront communities that receive grant awards must submit
2760 annual progress reports to the trust identifying project
2761 activities which are complete, and the progress achieved in
2762 meeting the goals outlined in the project application. The trust
2763 must implement a process to monitor and evaluate the performance
2764 of grant recipients in completing projects that are funded
2765 through the working waterfronts program.
2766 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
2767 it is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of
2768 Environmental Protection shall administer the working
2769 waterfronts capital outlay grant program as set forth in this
2770 section to support the commercial fishing and marine aquaculture
2771 industries, including the infrastructure for receiving or
2772 unloading seafood for the purpose of supporting the seafood
2773 economy.
2774 (a) The working waterfronts capital outlay grant program
2775 is created to provide funding to assist commercial saltwater
Page 111 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2776 products or commercial saltwater wholesale dealer or retailer
2777 license holders and seafood houses in maintaining their
2778 operations.
2779 (b) Eligible costs and expenditures include fixed capital
2780 outlay and operating capital outlay, including, but not limited
2781 to, the repair and maintenance or replacement of equipment, the
2782 repair and maintenance or replacement of water-adjacent
2783 facilities or infrastructure, and the construction or renovation
2784 of shoreside facilities.
2785 (c) The applicant must demonstrate a benefit to the local
2786 economy.
2787 (d) Grant recipients must submit annual progress reports
2788 to the department identifying project activities that are
2789 complete and the progress achieved in meeting the goals outlined
2790 in the project application.
2791 (e) The department shall implement a process to monitor
2792 and evaluate the performance of grant recipients in completing
2793 projects funded through the program.
2794 Section 84. The text of s. 380.5105, Florida Statutes, as
2795 carried forward from chapter 2024-228, Laws of Florida, by this
2796 act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that section shall
2797 revert to that in existence on June 30, 2024, except that any
2798 amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall be
2799 preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such
2800 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which
Page 112 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2801 expire pursuant to this section.
2802 Section 85. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2803 1951 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act and
2804 notwithstanding s. 823.11(4)(c), Florida Statutes, the Fish and
2805 Wildlife Conservation Commission may use funds appropriated for
2806 the derelict vessel removal program for grants to local
2807 governments or to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of, or to
2808 pay private contractors to remove, store, destroy, and dispose
2809 of, derelict vessels or vessels declared a public nuisance
2810 pursuant to s. 327.73(1)(aa), Florida Statutes. This section
2811 expires July 1, 2027.
2812 Section 86. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2813 1774 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (9)
2814 of section 403.0673, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2815 403.0673 Water quality improvement grant program.—A grant
2816 program is established within the Department of Environmental
2817 Protection to address wastewater, stormwater, and agricultural
2818 sources of nutrient loading to surface water or groundwater.
2819 (9) For the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year, and
2820 notwithstanding the requirements of this section and s. 403.890,
2821 funds appropriated from the Water Protection and Sustainability
2822 Program Trust Fund may be used as provided in the General
2823 Appropriations Act. This subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2824 Section 87. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
2825 2331 through 2338 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
Page 113 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2826 subsection (3) of section 288.80125, Florida Statutes, is
2827 amended to read:
2828 288.80125 Triumph Gulf Coast Trust Fund.—
2829 (3) For the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year, funds shall
2830 be used for the Rebuild Florida Revolving Loan Fund program to
2831 provide assistance to businesses impacted by Hurricane Michael
2832 as provided in the General Appropriations Act. This subsection
2833 expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2834 Section 88. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
2835 2055 through 2068, 2069D and 2069E, 2080 through 2090, 2092
2836 through 2100, and 2138 through 2151 of the 2026-2027 General
2837 Appropriations Act, paragraph (h) of subsection (7) of section
2838 339.135, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2839 339.135 Work program; legislative budget request;
2840 definitions; preparation, adoption, execution, and amendment.—
2841 (7) AMENDMENT OF THE ADOPTED WORK PROGRAM.—
2842 (h)1. Any work program amendment that also adds a new
2843 project, or phase thereof, to the adopted work program in excess
2844 of $3 million is subject to approval by the Legislative Budget
2845 Commission. Any work program amendment submitted under this
2846 paragraph must include, as supplemental information, a list of
2847 projects, or phases thereof, in the current 5-year adopted work
2848 program which are eligible for the funds within the
2849 appropriation category being used for the proposed amendment.
2850 The department shall provide a narrative with the rationale for
Page 114 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2851 not advancing an existing project, or phase thereof, in lieu of
2852 the proposed amendment.
2853 2. If the department submits an amendment to the
2854 Legislative Budget Commission and the commission does not meet
2855 or consider the amendment within 30 days after its submittal,
2856 the chair and vice chair of the commission may authorize the
2857 amendment to be approved pursuant to s. 216.177. This
2858 subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2859 Section 89. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2860 2055 through 2068, 2069D and 2069E, 2080 through 2090, 2092
2861 through 2100, and 2138 through 2151 of the 2026-2027 General
2862 Appropriations Act, the Department of Transportation is
2863 authorized to realign or increase budget authority within the
2864 Work Program to account for laws enacted which adjust the
2865 department's statutory revenue distributions. The department may
2866 submit budget amendments to realign or increase budget authority
2867 consistent with this section and pursuant to s. 339.135(7),
2868 Florida Statutes. This section expires July 1, 2027.
2869 Section 90. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2870 2396 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (6)
2871 of section 288.0655, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2872 288.0655 Rural Infrastructure Fund.—
2873 (6) For the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year, the funds
2874 appropriated for the grant program for Florida Panhandle
2875 counties shall be distributed pursuant to and for the purposes
Page 115 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2876 described in the proviso language associated with Specific
2877 Appropriation 2396 2113 of the 2026-2027 2025-2026 General
2878 Appropriations Act. This subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026.
2879 Section 91. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
2880 2759 through 2763 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
2881 and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes,
2882 the Division of Emergency Management may submit budget
2883 amendments, subject to the notice, review, and objection
2884 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget
2885 authority for projected expenditures due to reimbursements from
2886 federally declared disasters. This section expires July 1, 2027.
2887 Section 92. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2888 2367 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
2889 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 105 of chapter
2890 2025-199, subsections (4) and (5) of section 443.1113, Florida
2891 Statutes, are reenacted to read:
2892 443.1113 Reemployment Assistance Claims and Benefits
2893 Information System.—
2894 (4)(a) The Department of Commerce shall perform an annual
2895 review of the system and identify enhancements or modernization
2896 efforts that improve the delivery of services to claimants and
2897 employers and reporting to state and federal entities. These
2898 improvements are subject to appropriation, and must include, but
2899 need not be limited to:
2900 1. Infrastructure upgrades through cloud services.
Page 116 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2901 2. Software improvements.
2902 3. Enhanced data analytics and reporting.
2903 4. Increased cybersecurity pursuant to s. 282.318.
2904 (b) The department shall seek input on recommended
2905 enhancements from, at a minimum, the following entities:
2906 1. The Florida Digital Service within the Department of
2907 Management Services.
2908 2. The General Tax Administration Program Office within
2909 the Department of Revenue.
2910 3. The Division of Accounting and Auditing within the
2911 Department of Financial Services.
2912 (5) By September 1, 2025, and each year thereafter, the
2913 Department of Commerce shall submit a Reemployment Assistance
2914 Claims and Benefits Information System report to the Governor,
2915 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
2916 Representatives. The report must, at a minimum, include:
2917 (a) A summary of clearly defined deliverables and
2918 measurable outcomes of maintenance, enhancement, and
2919 modernization efforts over the last fiscal year.
2920 (b) A plan for the next 2 fiscal years of recommended
2921 enhancements or modernization efforts that includes projected
2922 nonrecurring project costs, clear deliverables, and timeframes
2923 for completion of each enhancement or modernization effort in
2924 priority order, and the projected recurring operations and
2925 maintenance costs after the completion of each enhancement or
Page 117 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2926 modernization effort.
2927 Section 93. The amendments to s. 443.1113(4) and (5),
2928 Florida Statutes, made by this act expire July 1, 2027, and the
2929 text of those subsections shall revert to that in existence on
2930 June 30, 2025, except that any amendments to such text enacted
2931 other than by this act shall be preserved and continue to
2932 operate to the extent that such amendments are not dependent
2933 upon the portions of text which expire pursuant to this section.
2934 Section 94. In order to implement Specific Appropriation
2935 2359 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsections
2936 (1) and (9) of section 445.08, Florida Statutes, are amended,
2937 and subsections (2) and (4) are reenacted, to read:
2938 445.08 Florida Law Enforcement Recruitment Bonus Payment
2939 Program.—
2940 (1) For the purposes of this section, the term:
2941 (a) "Commission" means the Criminal Justice Standards and
2942 Training Commission within the Department of Law Enforcement.
2943 (b) "Employing agency" means a state law enforcement
2944 agency has the same meaning as provided in s. 943.10(4).
2945 (c) "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as
2946 provided in s. 943.10(1).
2947 (d) "Newly employed officer" means a person who is a
2948 Florida resident and who gains or is appointed to full-time
2949 employment as a certified law enforcement officer with a Florida
2950 criminal justice employing agency on or after July 1, 2022, and
Page 118 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2951 who has never before been employed as a law enforcement officer
2952 in this state.
2953 (e) "Program" means the Florida Law Enforcement
2954 Recruitment Bonus Payment Program.
2955 (2)(a) There is created within the department the Florida
2956 Law Enforcement Recruitment Bonus Payment Program to aid in the
2957 recruitment of law enforcement officers within the state. The
2958 purpose of the program is to administer one-time bonus payments
2959 of up to $5,000 to each newly employed officer within the state.
2960 (b) Bonus payments provided to eligible newly employed
2961 officers are contingent upon legislative appropriations and
2962 shall be prorated subject to the amount appropriated for the
2963 program.
2964 (4) The department shall develop an annual plan for the
2965 administration of the program and distribution of bonus
2966 payments. Applicable employing agencies shall assist the
2967 department with the collection of any data necessary to
2968 determine bonus payment amounts and to distribute the bonus
2969 payments, and shall otherwise provide the department with any
2970 information or assistance needed to fulfill the requirements of
2971 this section. At a minimum, the plan must include:
2972 (a) The method for determining the estimated number of
2973 newly employed officers to gain or be appointed to full-time
2974 employment during the applicable fiscal year.
2975 (b) The minimum eligibility requirements a newly employed
Page 119 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
2976 officer must meet to receive and retain a bonus payment, which
2977 must include:
2978 1. Obtaining certification for employment or appointment
2979 as a law enforcement officer pursuant to s. 943.1395.
2980 2. Gaining full-time employment with a Florida criminal
2981 justice agency.
2982 3. Maintaining full-time employment as a law enforcement
2983 officer with a Florida criminal justice agency for at least 2
2984 years from the date on which the officer obtained certification.
2985 The required 2-year employment period may be satisfied by
2986 maintaining full-time employment at one or more employing
2987 agencies, but such period must not contain any break in service
2988 longer than 180 calendar days.
2989 (c) The standards by which the department will determine
2990 under what circumstances a break in service is acceptable. A law
2991 enforcement officer must provide documentation to the department
2992 justifying a break in service. For purposes of this section, the
2993 term "break in service" means a period of time during which the
2994 person is employed with a Florida criminal justice agency but is
2995 not employed as a full-time law enforcement officer or a period
2996 of time during which the person is in between employment as a
2997 full-time law enforcement officer for no longer than 15 days.
2998 The time period for any break in service does not count toward
2999 satisfying the 2-year full-time employment requirement of this
3000 section.
Page 120 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3001 (d) The method that will be used to determine the bonus
3002 payment amount to be distributed to each newly employed officer.
3003 (e) The method that will be used to distribute bonus
3004 payments to applicable employing agencies for distribution to
3005 eligible officers. Such method should prioritize distributing
3006 bonus payments to eligible officers in the most efficient and
3007 quickest manner possible.
3008 (f) The estimated cost to the department associated with
3009 developing and administering the program and distributing bonus
3010 payment funds.
3011 (g) The method by which an officer must reimburse the
3012 state if he or she received a bonus payment under the program,
3013 but failed to maintain continuous employment for the required 2-
3014 year period. Reimbursement shall not be required if an officer
3015 is discharged by his or her employing agency for a reason other
3016 than misconduct as designated on the affidavit of separation
3017 completed by the employing agency and maintained by the
3018 commission.
3019
3020 The department may establish other criteria deemed necessary to
3021 determine bonus payment eligibility and distribution.
3022 (9) This section expires July 1, 2027 2026.
3023 Section 95. (1) In order to implement section 8 of the
3024 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, beginning July 1, 2025,
3025 and on the first day of each month thereafter, the Department of
Page 121 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3026 Management Services shall assess an administrative health
3027 insurance assessment on each state agency equal to the
3028 employer's cost of individual employee health care coverage for
3029 each vacant position within such agency eligible for coverage
3030 through the Division of State Group Insurance. As used in this
3031 section, the term "state agency" means an agency within the
3032 State Personnel System, the Department of the Lottery, the
3033 Justice Administrative Commission and all entities
3034 administratively housed in the Justice Administrative
3035 Commission, and the state courts system.
3036 (2) Each state agency shall remit the assessed
3037 administrative health insurance assessment under subsection (1)
3038 to the State Employees Health Insurance Trust Fund, for the
3039 State Group Insurance Program, as provided in ss. 110.123 and
3040 110.1239, Florida Statutes, from currently allocated monies for
3041 salaries and benefits within 30 days after receipt of the
3042 assessment from the Department of Management Services. Should
3043 any state agency become more than 60 days delinquent in payment
3044 of this obligation, the Department of Management Services shall
3045 certify to the Chief Financial Officer the amount due and the
3046 Chief Financial Officer shall transfer the amount due to the
3047 Department of Management Services.
3048 (3) The administrative health insurance assessment shall
3049 apply to all vacant positions funded with state funds whether
3050 fully or partially funded with state funds. Vacant positions
Page 122 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3051 partially funded with state funds shall pay a percentage of the
3052 assessment imposed in subsection (1) equal to the percentage
3053 share of state funds provided for such vacant positions. No
3054 assessment shall apply to vacant positions fully funded with
3055 federal funds. Each state agency shall provide the Department of
3056 Management Services with a complete list of position numbers
3057 that are funded, or partially funded, with federal funding, and
3058 include the percentage of federal funding for each position no
3059 later than July 31, 2025, and shall update the list on the last
3060 day of each month thereafter. For federally funded vacant
3061 positions, or partially funded vacant positions, each state
3062 agency shall immediately take steps to include the
3063 administrative health insurance assessment in its indirect cost
3064 plan for the 2026-2027 fiscal year and each fiscal year
3065 thereafter. A state agency shall notify the Department of
3066 Management Services, the Executive Office of the Governor, the
3067 chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations and the chair of
3068 the House of Representatives Budget Committee upon approval of
3069 the updated indirect cost plan. If the state agency is not able
3070 to obtain approval from its federal awarding agency, the state
3071 agency must notify the Department of Management Services, the
3072 Executive Office of the Governor, and the appropriation and
3073 budget chairs no later than January 15, 2027.
3074 (4) Pursuant to the notice, review, and objection
3075 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, the Executive Office
Page 123 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3076 of the Governor may transfer budget authority appropriated in
3077 the Salaries and Benefits appropriation category between
3078 agencies in order to align the appropriations granted with the
3079 assessments that must be paid by each agency to the Department
3080 of Management Services for the administrative health insurance
3081 assessment.
3082 (5) This section expires July 1, 2027.
3083 Section 96. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
3084 2852 and 2853 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
3085 notwithstanding s. 11.13(1), Florida Statutes, the authorized
3086 salaries for members of the Legislature for the 2026-2027 fiscal
3087 year shall be set at the same level in effect on July 1, 2010.
3088 This section expires July 1, 2027.
3089 Section 97. In order to implement the transfer of funds
3090 from the General Revenue Fund from trust funds for the 2026-2027
3091 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding the expiration
3092 date in section 111 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida,
3093 paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 215.32, Florida
3094 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
3095 215.32 State funds; segregation.—
3096 (2) The source and use of each of these funds shall be as
3097 follows:
3098 (b)1. The trust funds shall consist of moneys received by
3099 the state which under law or under trust agreement are
3100 segregated for a purpose authorized by law. The state agency or
Page 124 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3101 branch of state government receiving or collecting such moneys
3102 is responsible for their proper expenditure as provided by law.
3103 Upon the request of the state agency or branch of state
3104 government responsible for the administration of the trust fund,
3105 the Chief Financial Officer may establish accounts within the
3106 trust fund at a level considered necessary for proper
3107 accountability. Once an account is established, the Chief
3108 Financial Officer may authorize payment from that account only
3109 upon determining that there is sufficient cash and releases at
3110 the level of the account.
3111 2. In addition to other trust funds created by law, to the
3112 extent possible, each agency shall use the following trust funds
3113 as described in this subparagraph for day-to-day operations:
3114 a. Operations or operating trust fund, for use as a
3115 depository for funds to be used for program operations funded by
3116 program revenues, with the exception of administrative
3117 activities when the operations or operating trust fund is a
3118 proprietary fund.
3119 b. Operations and maintenance trust fund, for use as a
3120 depository for client services funded by third-party payors.
3121 c. Administrative trust fund, for use as a depository for
3122 funds to be used for management activities that are departmental
3123 in nature and funded by indirect cost earnings and assessments
3124 against trust funds. Proprietary funds are excluded from the
3125 requirement of using an administrative trust fund.
Page 125 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3126 d. Grants and donations trust fund, for use as a
3127 depository for funds to be used for allowable grant or donor
3128 agreement activities funded by restricted contractual revenue
3129 from private and public nonfederal sources.
3130 e. Agency working capital trust fund, for use as a
3131 depository for funds to be used pursuant to s. 216.272.
3132 f. Clearing funds trust fund, for use as a depository for
3133 funds to account for collections pending distribution to lawful
3134 recipients.
3135 g. Federal grant trust fund, for use as a depository for
3136 funds to be used for allowable grant activities funded by
3137 restricted program revenues from federal sources.
3138
3139 To the extent possible, each agency must adjust its internal
3140 accounting to use existing trust funds consistent with the
3141 requirements of this subparagraph. If an agency does not have
3142 trust funds listed in this subparagraph and cannot make such
3143 adjustment, the agency must recommend the creation of the
3144 necessary trust funds to the Legislature no later than the next
3145 scheduled review of the agency's trust funds pursuant to s.
3146 215.3206.
3147 3. All such moneys are hereby appropriated to be expended
3148 in accordance with the law or trust agreement under which they
3149 were received, subject always to the provisions of chapter 216
3150 relating to the appropriation of funds and to the applicable
Page 126 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3151 laws relating to the deposit or expenditure of moneys in the
3152 State Treasury.
3153 4.a. Notwithstanding any provision of law restricting the
3154 use of trust funds to specific purposes, unappropriated cash
3155 balances from selected trust funds may be authorized by the
3156 Legislature for transfer to the Budget Stabilization Fund and
3157 General Revenue Fund in the General Appropriations Act.
3158 b. This subparagraph does not apply to trust funds
3159 required by federal programs or mandates; trust funds
3160 established for bond covenants, indentures, or resolutions whose
3161 revenues are legally pledged by the state or public body to meet
3162 debt service or other financial requirements of any debt
3163 obligations of the state or any public body; the Division of
3164 Licensing Trust Fund in the Department of Agriculture and
3165 Consumer Services; the State Transportation Trust Fund; the
3166 trust fund containing the net annual proceeds from the Florida
3167 Education Lotteries; the Florida Retirement System Trust Fund;
3168 trust funds under the management of the State Board of Education
3169 or the Board of Governors of the State University System, where
3170 such trust funds are for auxiliary enterprises, self-insurance,
3171 and contracts, grants, and donations, as those terms are defined
3172 by general law; trust funds that serve as clearing funds or
3173 accounts for the Chief Financial Officer or state agencies;
3174 trust funds that account for assets held by the state in a
3175 trustee capacity as an agent or fiduciary for individuals,
Page 127 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3176 private organizations, or other governmental units; and other
3177 trust funds authorized by the State Constitution.
3178 Section 98. The text of s. 215.32(2)(b), Florida Statutes,
3179 as carried forward from chapter 2011-47, Laws of Florida, by
3180 this act, expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that paragraph
3181 shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2011, except that
3182 any amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall
3183 be preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such
3184 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which
3185 expire pursuant to this section.
3186 Section 99. In order to implement the appropriations
3187 authorized in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for state
3188 employee travel and notwithstanding s. 112.061(6), Florida
3189 Statutes, rates of per diem and subsistence allowances shall be
3190 established by each state agency or the judicial branch. The
3191 rates may not exceed the rates established by the United States
3192 General Services Administration for per diem reimbursement
3193 rates. This section expires July 1, 2027.
3194 Section 100. In order to implement the appropriations
3195 authorized in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for state
3196 employee travel and notwithstanding s. 112.061(7)(d)1.a.,
3197 Florida Statutes, the mileage allowance for travel by privately
3198 owned vehicles for official travel shall be established by each
3199 state agency or the judicial branch. The mileage allowance may
3200 not exceed the standard mileage rates established by the
Page 128 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3201 Internal Revenue Service. This section expires July 1, 2027.
3202 Section 101. In order to implement appropriations in the
3203 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for state employee travel,
3204 the funds appropriated to each state agency which may be used
3205 for travel by state employees are limited during the 2026-2027
3206 fiscal year to travel for activities that are critical to each
3207 state agency's mission. Funds may not be used for travel by
3208 state employees to foreign countries, other states, conferences,
3209 staff training activities, or other administrative functions
3210 unless the agency head has approved, in writing, that such
3211 activities are critical to the agency's mission. The agency head
3212 shall consider using teleconferencing and other forms of
3213 electronic communication to meet the needs of the proposed
3214 activity before approving mission-critical travel. If
3215 international travel is approved, the agency must provide a
3216 quarterly report to the Speaker of the House of Representatives
3217 and the President of the Senate that provides the justification
3218 for such travel along with a breakdown of the associated costs.
3219 This section does not apply to travel for law enforcement
3220 purposes, military purposes, emergency management activities, or
3221 public health activities. This section expires July 1, 2027.
3222 Section 102. In order to implement the appropriations and
3223 reappropriations authorized in the 2026-2027 General
3224 Appropriations Act, paragraph (d) of subsection (11) of section
3225 216.181, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 129 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3226 216.181 Approved budgets for operations and fixed capital
3227 outlay.—
3228 (11)
3229 (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) and paragraph (2)(b),
3230 and for the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year only, the
3231 Legislative Budget Commission may approve budget amendments for
3232 new fixed capital outlay projects or increase the amounts
3233 appropriated to state agencies for fixed capital outlay
3234 projects. This paragraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
3235
3236 The provisions of this subsection are subject to the notice and
3237 objection procedures set forth in s. 216.177.
3238 Section 103. In order to implement the salaries and
3239 benefits, expenses, other personal services, contracted
3240 services, special categories, and operating capital outlay
3241 categories of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
3242 paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 216.292, Florida
3243 Statutes, is amended to read:
3244 216.292 Appropriations nontransferable; exceptions.—
3245 (2) The following transfers are authorized to be made by
3246 the head of each department or the Chief Justice of the Supreme
3247 Court whenever it is deemed necessary by reason of changed
3248 conditions:
3249 (a) The transfer of appropriations funded from identical
3250 funding sources, except appropriations for fixed capital outlay,
Page 130 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3251 and the transfer of amounts included within the total original
3252 approved budget and plans of releases of appropriations as
3253 furnished pursuant to ss. 216.181 and 216.192, as follows:
3254 1. Between categories of appropriations within a budget
3255 entity, if no category of appropriation is increased or
3256 decreased by more than 5 percent of the original approved budget
3257 or $250,000, whichever is greater, by all action taken under
3258 this subsection.
3259 2. Between budget entities within identical categories of
3260 appropriations, if no category of appropriation is increased or
3261 decreased by more than 5 percent of the original approved budget
3262 or $250,000, whichever is greater, by all action taken under
3263 this subsection.
3264 3. Any agency exceeding salary rate established pursuant
3265 to s. 216.181(8) on June 30th of any fiscal year shall not be
3266 authorized to make transfers pursuant to subparagraphs 1. and 2.
3267 in the subsequent fiscal year.
3268 4. Notice of proposed transfers under subparagraphs 1. and
3269 2. shall be provided to the Executive Office of the Governor and
3270 the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees at least
3271 3 days prior to agency implementation in order to provide an
3272 opportunity for review. The review shall be limited to ensuring
3273 that the transfer is in compliance with the requirements of this
3274 paragraph.
3275 5. For the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year, the review
Page 131 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3276 shall ensure that transfers proposed pursuant to this paragraph
3277 comply with this chapter, maximize the use of available and
3278 appropriate trust funds, and are not contrary to legislative
3279 policy and intent. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026.
3280 Section 104. In order to implement appropriations for
3281 state agencies in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
3282 section 11.52, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
3283 11.52 Implementation of enacted legislation.—Each state
3284 agency shall provide the Legislature and the Executive Office of
3285 the Governor with information about the status of implementation
3286 of recently enacted legislation. The implementation status must
3287 be provided 90 days following the effective date of the
3288 legislation and updated each August 1 thereafter until all
3289 provisions of the legislation have been fully implemented. The
3290 implementation status report must include, at a minimum, for
3291 each enacted legislation, the actions or steps taken to
3292 implement the legislation and planned actions or steps for
3293 implementation, such as any rules proposed for implementation,
3294 any procurements required, any contract executed to assist the
3295 agency in the implementation, any contracts executed to
3296 implement or administer the legislation, programs started,
3297 offices established, or other organization administrative
3298 changes made including personnel changes, or federal waivers
3299 requested; any expenditures made directly related to the
3300 implementation; and any impediments or delays in implementation,
Page 132 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3301 including, but not limited to, challenges of administrative
3302 rules. No later than 14 days prior to the next regular
3303 legislative session, the state agency shall provide an update of
3304 any changes to the implementation status, notify the Legislature
3305 of any protests of rulemaking or other communications regarding
3306 the implementation of the legislation and the status of any
3307 litigation related to the legislation, and identify any policy
3308 issues that need to be resolved by the Legislature to ensure
3309 timely and effective implementation of the legislation. This
3310 section expires July 1, 2027 2026.
3311 Section 105. In order to implement appropriations for
3312 state agencies and the judicial branch in the 2026-2027 General
3313 Appropriations Act, subsection (7) of section 216.013, Florida
3314 Statutes, is amended to read:
3315 216.013 Long-range program plan.—State agencies and the
3316 judicial branch shall develop long-range program plans to
3317 achieve state goals using an interagency planning process that
3318 includes the development of integrated agency program service
3319 outcomes. The plans shall be policy based, priority driven,
3320 accountable, and developed through careful examination and
3321 justification of all agency and judicial branch programs.
3322 (7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, each
3323 state executive agency and the judicial branch are not required
3324 to develop or post a long-range program plan by September 30,
3325 2026 2025, for the 2027-2028 2026-2027 fiscal year, except in
Page 133 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3326 circumstances outlined in any updated written instructions
3327 prepared by the Executive Office of the Governor in consultation
3328 with the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees.
3329 This subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026.
3330 Section 106. In order to implement appropriations for
3331 state agencies and the judicial branch in the 2026-2027 General
3332 Appropriations Act, subsection (7) of section 216.023, Florida
3333 Statutes, is amended to read:
3334 216.023 Legislative budget requests to be furnished to
3335 Legislature by agencies.—
3336 (7) As part of the legislative budget request, each state
3337 agency and the judicial branch shall include an inventory of all
3338 ongoing technology-related projects that have a cumulative
3339 estimated or realized cost of more than $1 million. The
3340 inventory must, at a minimum, contain all of the following
3341 information:
3342 (a) The name of the technology system.
3343 (b) A brief description of the purpose and function of the
3344 system.
3345 (c) A brief description of the goals of the project.
3346 (d) The initiation date of the project.
3347 (e) The key performance indicators for the project.
3348 (f) Any other metrics for the project evaluating the
3349 health and status of the project.
3350 (g) The original and current baseline estimated end dates
Page 134 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3351 of the project.
3352 (h) The original and current estimated costs of the
3353 project.
3354 (i) Total funds appropriated or allocated to the project
3355 and the current realized cost for the project by fiscal year.
3356
3357 For purposes of this subsection, an ongoing technology-related
3358 project is one which has been funded or has had or is expected
3359 to have expenditures in more than one fiscal year. An ongoing
3360 technology-related project does not include the continuance of
3361 existing hardware and software maintenance agreements, the
3362 renewal of existing software licensing agreements, or the
3363 replacement of desktop units with new technology that is
3364 substantially similar to the technology being replaced. This
3365 subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026.
3366 Section 107. In order to implement appropriations in the
3367 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the use of state funds
3368 must be consistent with the following principles of individual
3369 freedom:
3370 (1) No person is inherently racist, sexist, or oppressive,
3371 whether consciously or unconsciously, solely by virtue of his or
3372 her race or sex.
3373 (2) No race is inherently superior to another race.
3374 (3) No person should be discriminated against or receive
3375 adverse treatment solely or partly on the basis of race, color,
Page 135 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3376 national origin, religion, disability, or sex.
3377 (4) Meritocracy or traits such as a hard work ethic are
3378 not racist but fundamental to the right to pursue happiness and
3379 be rewarded for industry.
3380 (5) A person, by virtue of his or her race or sex, does
3381 not bear responsibility for actions committed in the past by
3382 other members of the same race or sex.
3383 (6) A person should not be instructed that he or she must
3384 feel guilt, anguish, or other forms of psychological distress
3385 for actions, in which he or she played no part, committed in the
3386 past by other members of the same race or sex.
3387
3388 This section expires July 1, 2027.
3389 Section 108. In order to implement appropriations for
3390 state agencies in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, a
3391 state agency may not use state funds to contract with an
3392 advertising agency or other contractor who acts as or uses the
3393 services of media reliability and bias monitors. The term "media
3394 reliability and bias monitor" means any contractor whose primary
3395 or principal function is to rate or rank news and information
3396 services for the factual accuracy of their content, whether the
3397 content is published online, in print, by audio, or digitally,
3398 or by broadcasting via radio, television, cable, streaming
3399 service, or any other way news is delivered to the public; or to
3400 provide ratings or a subjective evaluation of news and
Page 136 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3401 information services regarding misinformation, bias, adherence
3402 to journalistic standards, or ethics. The term includes, but is
3403 not limited to, organizations that engage in fact checking. The
3404 term does not include any contractor that rates media outlets
3405 for audience size, viewership, and demographic information; or
3406 that monitors media outlets for the purpose of compiling press
3407 or video clippings or aggregating news sources for the purpose
3408 of public relations and public awareness. This section expires
3409 July 1, 2027.
3410 Section 109. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
3411 2601 through 2615 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
3412 paragraph (d) of subsection (12) of section 440.13, Florida
3413 Statutes, is amended to read:
3414 440.13 Medical services and supplies; penalty for
3415 violations; limitations.—
3416 (12) CREATION OF THREE-MEMBER PANEL; GUIDES OF MAXIMUM
3417 REIMBURSEMENT ALLOWANCES.—
3418 (d)1. Outpatient reimbursement for scheduled surgeries
3419 shall be 60 percent of charges.
3420 2. Reimbursement for emergency services and care as
3421 defined in s. 395.002 which have not been assigned a maximum
3422 reimbursement allowance must be 250 percent of Medicare, unless
3423 there is a contract, in which case the contract governs
3424 reimbursement. Upon this subparagraph taking effect, the
3425 department shall engage with an actuarial services firm to begin
Page 137 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3426 development of maximum reimbursement allowances for services
3427 subject to the reimbursement provisions of this subparagraph.
3428 Until the three-member panel adopts a schedule of maximum
3429 reimbursement allowances, reimbursement for emergency services
3430 and care that have not been assigned a maximum reimbursement
3431 allowance and for which there is no Medicare billing code must
3432 be 75 percent of usual and customary charges, unless there is a
3433 contract, in which case the contract governs reimbursement. This
3434 subparagraph expires June 30, 2027 2026.
3435
3436 The department, as requested, shall provide data to the panel,
3437 including, but not limited to, utilization trends in the
3438 workers' compensation health care delivery system. The
3439 department shall provide the panel with an annual report
3440 regarding the resolution of medical reimbursement disputes and
3441 any actions pursuant to subsection (8). The department shall
3442 provide administrative support and service to the panel to the
3443 extent requested by the panel. The department may adopt rules
3444 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this
3445 subsection. For prescription medication purchased under the
3446 requirements of this subsection, a dispensing practitioner shall
3447 not possess such medication unless payment has been made by the
3448 practitioner, the practitioner's professional practice, or the
3449 practitioner's practice management company or employer to the
3450 supplying manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, or drug
Page 138 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3451 repackager within 60 days of the dispensing practitioner taking
3452 possession of that medication.
3453 Section 110. The amendment to s. 440.13(12)(d), Florida
3454 Statutes, made by this act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of
3455 that paragraph shall revert to that in existence on June 30,
3456 2025, except that any amendments to such text enacted other than
3457 by this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the
3458 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions
3459 of text which expire pursuant to this section.
3460 Section 111. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
3461 1512 through 1517 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act,
3462 and notwithstanding the expiration date in section 127 of
3463 chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, paragraph (b) of subsection
3464 (2) of section 373.0421, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
3465 373.0421 Establishment and implementation of minimum flows
3466 and minimum water levels.—
3467 (2) If, at the time a minimum flow or minimum water level
3468 is initially established for a water body pursuant to s. 373.042
3469 or is revised, the existing flow or water level in the water
3470 body is below, or is projected to fall within 20 years below,
3471 the applicable minimum flow or minimum water level, the
3472 department or governing board, as part of the regional water
3473 supply plan described in s. 373.709, shall concurrently adopt or
3474 modify and implement a recovery or prevention strategy. If a
3475 minimum flow or minimum water level has been established for a
Page 139 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3476 water body pursuant to s. 373.042, and the existing flow or
3477 water level in the water body falls below, or is projected to
3478 fall within 20 years below, the applicable minimum flow or
3479 minimum water level, the department or governing board shall
3480 expeditiously adopt a recovery or prevention strategy. A
3481 recovery or prevention strategy shall include the development of
3482 additional water supplies and other actions, consistent with the
3483 authority granted by this chapter, to:
3484 (b) Prevent the existing flow or water level from falling
3485 below the established minimum flow or minimum water level.
3486
3487 The recovery or prevention strategy must include a phased-in
3488 approach or a timetable which will allow for the provision of
3489 sufficient water supplies for all existing and projected
3490 reasonable-beneficial uses, including development of additional
3491 water supplies and implementation of conservation and other
3492 efficiency measures concurrent with and, to the maximum extent
3493 practical, to offset reductions in permitted withdrawals,
3494 consistent with this chapter. The recovery or prevention
3495 strategy may not depend solely on water shortage restrictions
3496 declared pursuant to s. 373.175 or s. 373.246. Agricultural
3497 producers who implement best management practices adopted in s.
3498 403.067(7)(c)2. shall be presumed to be in compliance with the
3499 recovery or prevention strategy.
3500 Section 112. The text of s. 373.0421(2)(b), Florida
Page 140 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3501 Statutes, as carried forward by this act, expires July 1, 2027,
3502 and the text of that paragraph shall revert to that in existence
3503 on June 30, 2025, except that any amendments to such text
3504 enacted other than by this act shall be preserved and continue
3505 to operate to the extent that such amendments are not dependent
3506 upon the portions of text which expire pursuant to this section.
3507 Section 113. In order to implement Specific Appropriations
3508 2923 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and
3509 notwithstanding any other law:
3510 (1) The Governor, the Cabinet officers, and the
3511 Legislature are permanent tenants of the Capitol Complex. The
3512 interior space allocated to each tenant on or after January 1,
3513 2026, may not be reduced or moved without express consent of the
3514 tenant. If additional interior space becomes vacant, the
3515 Legislature has the first right of refusal for use of the space.
3516 (2)(a) Before the Department of Management Services may
3517 plan for or schedule any project in the Capitol Center that
3518 impacts space occupied by a permanent tenant of the Capitol
3519 Complex other than the Governor, the Department of Management
3520 Services must coordinate with the tenant and receive the
3521 tenant's approval on the scope, design, and timeline of the
3522 project. For purposes of space in which the Legislature is the
3523 tenant, the Department of Management Services must coordinate
3524 with and receive approval from the President of the Senate for
3525 space allocated to the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Page 141 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3526 Representatives for space allocated to the House of
3527 Representatives, or both the President and the Speaker for space
3528 allocated jointly to both chambers. For any project that impacts
3529 space in which the Legislature is the tenant, the Department of
3530 Management Services must consider the schedule and time
3531 constraints of the Legislature, as well as the Legislature's
3532 needs.
3533 (b) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the
3534 House of Representatives may design, redesign, renovate, or
3535 upgrade any space allocated to their respective chambers in
3536 which the Senate or the House of Representatives is the tenant
3537 without approval by the Department of Management Services.
3538 (c) The Department of Management Services must consult
3539 with and receive approval from the President of the Senate for
3540 space allocated to the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
3541 Representatives for space allocated to the House of
3542 Representatives, or both the President and the Speaker for space
3543 allocated jointly to both chambers before including in the
3544 report required under s. 272.09(3), Florida Statutes, any
3545 project that impacts any space in the Capitol Complex in which
3546 the Legislature is the tenant.
3547 (3) In carrying out the provisions of the Capitol Center
3548 long-range planning specified in s. 272.121, Florida Statutes,
3549 the Department of Management Services must solicit feedback from
3550 all permanent tenants of the Capitol Center, including the
Page 142 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3551 Governor, the Chief Financial Officer, the Attorney General, the
3552 Commissioner of Agriculture, the President of the Senate, and
3553 the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
3554 (4) The parking spaces within the Capitol Center area
3555 allocated to the Legislature on January 1, 2026, may not be
3556 reduced or reassigned without the express consent of the
3557 Legislature. If additional parking spaces become available for
3558 assignment, the Legislature has the first right of refusal for
3559 the use of the parking spaces.
3560 (5) This section expires July 1, 2027.
3561 Section 114. Any section of this act which implements a
3562 specific appropriation or specifically identified proviso
3563 language in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act is void if
3564 the specific appropriation or specifically identified proviso
3565 language is vetoed. Any section of this act which implements
3566 more than one specific appropriation or more than one portion of
3567 specifically identified proviso language in the 2026-2027
3568 General Appropriations Act is void if all the specific
3569 appropriations or portions of specifically identified proviso
3570 language are vetoed.
3571 Section 115. If any other act passed during the 2026
3572 Regular Session of the Legislature contains a provision that is
3573 substantively the same as a provision in this act, but that
3574 removes or is otherwise not subject to the future repeal applied
3575 to such provision by this act, the Legislature intends that the
Page 143 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5003 2026
3576 provision in the other act takes precedence and continues to
3577 operate, notwithstanding the future repeal provided by this act.
3578 Section 116. If any provision of this act or its
3579 application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
3580 invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of
3581 the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision
3582 or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are
3583 severable.
3584 Section 117. Except as otherwise expressly provided in
3585 this act and except for this section, which shall take effect
3586 upon this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1,
3587 2026, or, if this act fails to become a law until after that
3588 date, it shall take effect upon becoming a law and shall operate
3589 retroactively to July 1, 2026.
Page 144 of 144
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5003-00